She was so small and I was so scared to hold her.
“These are not just little errors,” Kessler said, adding that consorting with prostitutes could easily lead to blackmail, which could put the president at risk.
The moral problem, as vanden Heuvel points out, is not with us. It’s with them, the guys running on the poorest slate the Republican Party has fielded in the last hundred years.
"About a quarter of the more than 26,000 adults surveyed reported experiencing verbal abuse as children, nearly 15 percent had been physical abused, and more than 12 percent -- more than one in ten -- had been sexually abused as a child."
By a new nationality law (12 June 1951), Libyan Jews were not allowed to have passports or Libyan nationality certificates, but only traveling documents whose renewal was not automatic. Postal relations with Israel were suspended in 1954, emigration to Israel was restricted, tourism to Israel banned.
"Hoarding" in the strictest sense is the acquisition of scarce resources you don't necessarily need so that you can try to use those scarce resources to make a profit off of others at some point in the future. Maybe you're buying up the last of some item and turning around and reselling it to people who are willing to pay you a lot more than you bought it for because you got the last stuff--that's hoarding. But if there's plenty of a certain item on the shelf at the store, then buying a lot of that item and building up a surplus isn't hoarding!
For some strange reason, the first time I saw the teaser for Ladies Vs Ricky Bahl (LVRB), I caught the last frame where Ranveer stares at the viewer with the words “you’re next” leading me to think this was a film about a serial killer – however, thanks to the de rigeur incessant promotion of films in general these days, that notion was quickly put to rest. But there was no avoiding the red and white nightingale voiced elephant in the room that is Band Baaja Baaraat – after all, this is the first film reuniting Maneesh, Anushka and Ranveer since BBB (which took us all by surprise and made itself comfortable in our hearts and minds) and expectations were high. And try as we might, the comparison with BBB would remain, despite the best of intentions.
If this is how birthday parties are going to be from here on out, count me in. No more pinatas! No more party games! My days of elaborately themed parties have come to an end, and I couldn't be happier.
She gave. He took. He forgot. –Tobias Wolff
The story in Small Pond follows a Kirsten, a directionless twentysomething woman who has been sucked into life in her small mid-western college town. She's on the cusp of either embracing life as a townie or finding some way out. She doesn't have any ambition and she has a hipster disdain of most of the people she meets. And she's irresponsible and not entirely in control of her impulses. Her landlord is selling the house where she lives and he's told her that she and her roommate have the right of first refusal, should they want the house. She works a dead end job in a pizza parlor. She spends her nights in a drunken haze, dodging people she finds annoying. Lynn, her roommate is fed up with her, particularly her penchant for providing nothing to the fridge in the way of food (and eating what Lynn herself provides). Her other friend, Katie, she's known since they were kids, but Katie has become one of those New Age-y people that Kirsten can't really abide. Kirsten views Katie as a kind of tag along. She's short of friends, though, so she can't really afford to lose any. Kirsten also declines a promotion at her job--foolishly it turns out--that would provide her with medical benefits. When she has a ghastly accident late in the movie with some stolen whip-its, it provides her with an existential crisis of identity. The time has come, it seems, to finally take her life in hand...
Heat 2-3 tsp oil over medium-high heat. Add shrimp and cook until firm and pink. With a slotted spoon, remove shrimp from the pan. Lower heat to medium. If necessary, add more oil. Add onion, garlic, both paprika, and cumin to pan, cook for 2-3 minutes, stirring often. Add tomatoes and 1 tsp salt. Cook until the sauce has thickened and most of the liquid has evaporated. Add coconut milk and herbs. Bring to a simmer, add shrimp, and heat through. Serve with rice and a side salad.
15 Glory
So.... what's the point? Healthy competition vs. creating something new and exciting? Is this a dick waving contest between Brewdog and Schorschbrau? Eh, maybe!
Reflection on the top left corner and the foreground is a distraction – so editing is necessary.
Kougar has always been the silent and lethal warrior that shows no emotion. No much is know about Kougar's past by anyone. He is the oldest of the group and the most mysterious since he never gets too close to anyone, not even the other warriors.
Today Johannesburg appears to be a run down shanty town with decrepit buildings, boarded up windows, filthy garbage riddled streets and squalor everywhere.
Speaking of which, Youtuber GereGere points out that the reason the lyrics are what they are at the bridges of the song is because it’s a nod to the Sonic Team, the developers of the game. “Sight Of Night I Cheer To Embrace A Magic.”
The game of Agile development is simple to learn and to play, at least in comparison to traditional development. As a result, it is much easier to reach the goal and provide a high degree of job satisfaction. In my book, that’s a win-win.
We took the requisite jumping photos, peace-sign poses and profile pictures before beginning our final ascent to the last watchtower. I think the three of us thought we were on the verge of collapse, but when we climbed (some might say crawled) onto that last platform, the view made it all worthwhile. This is definitely one wall worth seeing.
From the Applicants’ allegation, it becomes clear that they understand that several of their rights – all within the scope of personality rights – have already been violated by the divulgation of the first Defendant’s thesis concerning the events that are related to the third Applicant’s disappearance in May of 2007. A thesis according to which the third Applicant would have passed away on the 3rd of May of 2007 in the Praia da Luz apartment, and her cadaver concealed by the first and second
He continued that the bonuses announced on Wednesday for Stephen Hester, the chief executive of RBS, and Eric Daniels, the outgoing chief executive of Lloyds, as ‘extraordinarily wrong’. Daniels is to be paid a £1.45m bonus on top of his salary of £1m, and Hester £2.04m. Both banks are supported by the taxpayer.
We pulled over in Ogallala, Nebraska. A small ranching town, we had a hard time finding a restaurant of any sort, so pulled into a gas station to ask for advice. We were directed on down to, and I quote, "the sale barn."
Morello: He’s been catatonic since his guest appearance on the Summoner Showcase.
Also, he most definitely has certain ways of how to do things, and an orderly fashion about him. I can tell you, this does not come from me! :) If something he deems important is not done is the manner in which he feels necessary (vitamins distributed the same each morning, underwear not hanging from the knobs of his dresser etc.), he not only notices, but it unnerves him! I keep telling myself all this will serve him down the road - his organized and confident self - and that this is a kid that clearly needs to exert himself. In the meantime, we are living the life of learning boundaries and consistency....and facing the meltdowns with the knowing that this too shall pass :)
So back to the first guys life verse Eph. 3: 18-19
Quake catastrophe like Japan’s could hit Pacific Northwest, new data show
While I often fail to recognize people when I see their faces, I can recognize the way they walk from the back or their handwriting or voice or scent.
This is emphasized in the very speech that Jules gives to one of the robbers, that he can kill with impunity because of his role, that it has nothing to do with anything he is. He mentions that his bibilical quote is almost incidental to his character, like so many of the details of the parts in this movie. It was just a cold-blooded thing to say. It is something he never questioned. Only now does he try to place others in the parts of the saying:
She has dimples,
The concept behind Global Cycle Solutions is to take the 1 billion bicycles in the world and put them to work for something besides pedaling around. Started in Cambridge, Massachusetts by a group of MIT engineers and brainiacs, GCS’s blinding flash of brilliance was to design a universal adaptor that allows bikes to do anything from processing agricultural food to running home appliances to charging batteries.
I was reading David Brooks’ op-ed piece in the New York Times earlier today, and he made several interesting points about the competitive arenas into which we’re groomed versus the creations which have innovated our culture. I encourage you to read the article in its entirety, but here are a few of the lines that really resonated with me.
Size 5mm hook
This is great. It is all finished and ordinarily I would just be crawling, not scrambling out of bed!
Step into the future of sustainablity by joining us this Saturday!
The Bruery Black Orchard
In Alex Salmond’s own backyard, the SNP returned the largest number of councillors but not enough for a majority.
My students complain that post-graduate education isn’t strong in China and want to go overseas. In rural areas, the elementary level is much worse…
Thank you for all the brilliant entries last week. :)
but its my style. take it or leave it.
along with songs from a few of my favorite albums of 2010 and a number of the classics that everyone loves. I have a couple of nice, rare singles for you in the mix as well.
I will be giving you my cell phone number for support anytime and you’d better believe that I will be calling YOU if you don’t hear from you on the private Facebook group! I’m committed to your success!!
I don’t like you feeling unloved.
Earlier this week I had dinner in a lovely home. The sitting room had nearly all of the attributes of an attractive, cosy room: a wood-burning fire, soft sofas, interesting pictures, ancient (but good) carpets . . . but sadly, no bookshelves. I noticed it right away, and the absence somehow detracted.
(Later in the interview, Markowitz more accurately says it was “opposite” where O’Malley wanted to build.)
MASS ARRESTS AND LIENS
The UK is due to pull out of Afghanistan by the end of 2014, after 13 years of operations.
I'm not sure why, but the bath was not okay. I don't remember the reason my mom gave me, but she told me to take a quick shower instead.
There always seems to be a theme with the life lessons I am learning these days... trust. Trust that he has me, that he won't let me go, that I won't drown if I allow him to take me where I am scared to go and that it might even be fun.
This poster was already lightly printed with a grid! I didn't know they had them! That was a huge timesaver! I wanted to add some silverware in between the sponsors but my Imagine started having a "spell" again and cutting was way off! I tried calibrating but after 6 times and at midnight! I gave up! It was going to have to be good enough! they loved it anyway. I used Kate's Kitchen for the pancakes! and all other pictures! That cart is awesome! But of course its still not working in CCR so had to cut and print some practice ones and I just used those for the scrapbook page! The letters were cut with Lyrical Letters. It was a lot of fun making this! And went pretty fast considering all the CCR and calibraion issues!
The language fades. The noise is more
But before I carry on, a disclaimer. I haven't yet, at the time of writing, paid a visit to the Occupy movement at St Paul's Cathedral. I would like to, but, for reasons I will explain later on in this post, I still haven't made up my mind. I have, however, followed with great interest the wave of protests, uprisings and insubordination that has engulfed the world in the last twelve months.
2 instances
subsequent record has marked somewhat of a shift in sound and atmosphere (some
and when Nick left for work this morning,
● African officials complain of hypocrisy and double standards on the part of Westerners, who used DDT to eradicate their own malaria problems decades ago but now push Africa to rely on harder-to-implement methods such as mosquito nets.
Independence Brewing's head brewer Justin Rizza is leaving his position with the Austin brewery and will be running the Round Rock brewpub operations. Flix should be brewing and selling their own house beers within a few weeks.
First however, McFadden and Celtic must come to an agreement over, what one would presume to be, a substantial deal.
Next off, a lot of the material makes more sense in the context of the story here. While there are some moments where I wonder how things are justified in terms of how the action rolls off, those are the 'gamer dice' rolling in my head and don't interfere with my enjoyment of the story. The characters here are competent and knowledgeable, they 'fit' into their setting. More impressive is that Drew takes a female and male pair and doesn't have them fall in love at the end of the novel! Applause to you Drew Karpyshyn!
SeattleDad over at Luke I am Your Father - one of my favorite Dad Bloggers - posted this fun little meme the other day and "tagged" me to suggest I might like to try it, too. You know what? He was right. This is kinda neat. And, hey, it's not like I have a lot of fresh content on here lately. Might as well delve into the archives for a bit of fun, eh?
I took a break from gardening yesterday but I did visit my Dad’s plot in St Annes Park in Raheny yesterday evening. It was such a beautiful evening, the sun was setting in the walled garden and the allotment garden looked gorgeous. My dad’s plot is in a well established park and there’s a huge amount of wildlife in the area and it was great to hear the cacophany of birdsong there yesterday evening. The allotments have been there two years are it’s great to see how they’ve changed since they opened. There’s some really lovely plots there and I got some great ideas for my own plot while looking around.
Experience with creating and maintaining Tables, Stored Procedures, Views, Queries, Indexes, Scheduled Jobs
Owned by Vinery and trained by Michael Stidham, Diamante de Fuego (El Corredor-Matsue by Lure) raced twice last summer at Delaware Park.
Though “global warming” may not be a motivating force for behavior change, the receipt of attention and encouragement from others in our social communities is very motivating. If you need proof, just take a minute and think about the amount of time you spend on Facebook every week! That same social force can be used to motivate green behavior.
Combine everything in a sauce pan large enough to hold it. Whisk everything together until well combined and put on heat. Bring to a boil and then reduce to a simmer. Simmer about 10 minutes or until reduced by 25%. Cool, bottle in a squeeze bottle, and refrigerate. Avoid the temptation to use it for 24 hours, so the flavors can blend together.
Along from where our house rests its wheels is a pile of moss and timber that was once a barn. The roof has caved in completely and all around nettles and brambles grow. There by the barn-that-was lie stacks of old pallets. Weathered by time and the sky, grey and holey. Perfect for a poverty stricken artist who cannot afford expensive framers. I bought cheap clip frames to provide the glass and the backing and had mounts cut. The rest was done by Tui with glue and staples and sandpaper. Here are the magnificent rustic results in progress and in all their gallery glory!
If the economy is so bad, why was Vegas so crowded? It was a nice little vacation. The weather was good, except for the wind. The company was good, except for the daughter-in-law. (Not really, she was okay too.) The food was good and the drinks kept coming. It was nice for Rick to spend some time with his brother. I don’t think they have hung out together like that in years.
“I’m going to head to Bear Claw Village and try to get the old Kung Fu teacher to come to Yellow Clay Village. I will meet you there,” said Hornmel to his cousin.
May you live each day with the deep love of self that was created within you. Sometimes we make it difficult for ourselves to see and feel it, but it is always there. If you need help finding it, ask the Angels to help you rediscover that truth that is your soul.
He is a no-nonsense career Marine with a reputation for straight talk. His testimony is sure to set straight Congress and the American people. Counterinsurgency is the toughest type of war for a democracy, and these past few months have put American will to the test.
as much,
I must confess, I love pickles...any kind, dill, sweet, hot, half sour, but dill pickles, are my all-time favorite. I could munch on it, just by itself. Why would you want to pay $2.00 for a large dill pickle from the deli, or buy a jar of the refrigerated Kosher Dill's for up to $5.00 for a large jar, or even more! Those pickles are very good, and crispy crunchy, but sometimes they are too sour, too garlicky, or not sour enough. When you make your own brine for your pickles, you know that they are pure...no preservatives, no funny "off" taste, just pure fresh, crunchy dill pickles.
For the record that is totally untrue! TOTALLY UNTRUE!
say hello to little orphan annie.
Though the book is small in size it is huge in regards to the content, (the important message) that it communicates and that is how we as the people of God need to be and can be “unleashed for the purpose of God” in our lives. And that is what God wants to do…he wants us to be set free or unleashed in the world so we can fulfill his purpose for our lives thus advancing the cause of his Kingdom in our world that souls be saved, saints edified and good be done unto all people, especially those of the household of faith.
Asner’s response is shocking in its stupidity, but not surprising, coming from a communist. From a professed libertarian like Stern, however, who has long chafed at any limits on his right to express himself, such hypocrisy is disappointing. Perhaps Stern is just one of the glibertarians one runs into nowadays, for whom “libertarianism” is merely a sophistic rhetoric meant to make them rich as Croesus, rather than a principled philosophy. And of course, it’s he’s covering his own derriere, by acting properly outraged. But that won’t help him, when black racists go after him. And they will. He would have done better to show some integrity.
I'm a big Sarah McLachlan fan. As far as I'm concerned, what's not to like? She has the voice of an angel, she's a great songwriter and a talented musician - oh yeah, and she's also beautiful and sexy as hell. And she's from the country where I hold honourary citizenship.
Pictured below are the raised beds which were constructed for Lachie's parents. One thing to note is that nothing, and I mean nothing is ever straight forward here. "We'll build a couple of raised beds for my mum and dad" he said. No bother, nice and easy, 8 lengths of timber, some long screws, a pile of manure, some topsoil and Bob's your Uncle I thought. - NO!
She sits two footsteps away from where the waves hit the shore. Her eyes flash to the sky. An eternity ago, she could tell time by the position of moon; now, though, everything stands transfixed.
By the time of Picture Scoop's publication, Jack Cole had left Lev Gleason, worked briefly for MLJ (Archie) and then moved over to Quality Comics. It's an interesting revelation in itself to see evidence that Cole still dabbled in freelance work during his years in the comic book industry.
There is an awesome feed store about a mile from our house where I buy all our chicken feed and the flock blocks (which are made by Purina for those of who have never heard of them and asked me about them in a previous POST). The owner is a kind, generous soul who really cares about his customers.
Without women, the beginning of our lives would be devoid of support, the middle of - of pleasure and the end - of consolation.
My husband already thought I was some sort of cooking wizard, and at risk of giving away the mystique, I showed him how to make biscuits from scratch.
I am so tired of holly-sprays
Over the weekend, I went to Port Townsend, WA, for a Power Plotting Weekend with the amazing Mary Buckham. (If you're interested, I'll share some of what I learned on Fiction Friday.) I flew out early and stayed over another day so I'd have time to sightsee.
Two of them are Facebook friends so they haven't totally left my life, but still. I miss their thoughts and struggles and humor.
4 months wasn't long enough to adjust to the sight of the helpless "Little Boy" complete with oxygen, that my once strong father turned into.........
This was my favorite piece of the series. I'm really happy with the way it came out and already have a list of driftwood projects I want to create starting with this candle holder from Completely Coastal! Have you created any faux driftwood projects? If you have share a pic on our facebook page for a chance to be featured on Stephanie @ Home!
After that introduction, we got a very good performance of Giulio Cesare, where the revolving Egyptian pyramid constrained by Roman concrete did duty for all kinds of things and the production was fresh and inventive. Pamela Helen Stephenson was suitably mannish as Giulio Cesare in a battle-weary greatcoat while the countertenor James Laing was camply evil and perverted as Tolomeo. Sarah Tynan was very lovely–also clearly a very good actress–as Cleopatra and sang very accurately. She didn’t really suggest a woman who could dispose of her husband-brother and several other rival claimants to the throne without any bother at all, but that’s not in the piece either so not her fault. But perhaps the partt needs someone to wallow more lushly.
BEST ARCHIVAL RELEASE OF AN EXISTING SCORE
3. Never Let Me Go
Open Heaven, Heaven’s love
So, coming back to Cast Lead, this was certainly not our invasion and their defense. When facing the armies of the United States and the Soviet Union in World War II, did the Germans have the moral right to self-defense because those armies invaded their country? The entire invasion of the allies into Germany was self-defense against Nazi Germany. To claim that, in Gaza, they are defending themselves against our invasion is really a not-serious objection.
My little girl has a few things in her room though..
Sierra Nevada Brewing Co. Sierra Nevada Bigfoot Barleywine Style Ale
Relationships can be tricky. Yes, sometimes a man is confused about what he wants; but as a woman, how long do you wait around for him to figure it out? It’s a thin line between a man being confused and him stringing you along; make it your business to find out early on, which is which. Your feelings will thank you in the long run.
10 minutes to establish a 1RM Snatch from blocks (just below the knee).
Or, three.
I will offer the opinion that this Mocknick person--if he's "beetleboy2007" --should probably not be your first choice to have as an agent in charge of your literary career. Worse things may be going on here than just charging fees.
When she came to Elgin she worked at Henderson Furniture. She had to dust the furniture and use a Ewbank on the carpets. There was no vacuum cleaner to use.
Trade paperback 6x9
The danger of jilted humans seeking revenge on their jilters has been recognised by Facebook, which has banned naked photos from its network. Also banned are pictures of urine, vomit, semen and ear wax. I think they’ve gone too far with ear wax. No one should be ashamed about what comes out of their ears, which is difficult to distinguish from guacamole in any case.
I'm sorry. I did not understand. If you're having problems with your high speed internet and would like tech support, say "yes".
04 - Drum Solo 03:18
For white enamel, paint of any colour, brass, copper, or plate, also furniture of any description, leather or bamboo, take four or five roots, leaves, flowers and tendrils of dandelion and about 3 pints of water. Boil until it becomes brown and about half the quantity.
"Database copyright does not protect fixture list data, says AG
Political fights with your lover
That’s it – three entries per person! And the entries must be comments on this post – entries made via Facebook comment, tweet, email, singing telegram or smoke signal will be tossed out like yesterday’s pineapple rinds.
I'm on the verge of getting very frustrated with social networking. Every day it feels as though something new is popping up, some must-do, fantastic site which will help us sell loads of books and reach a new audience: Klout, Google+, Triberr... just to name a few.
Rolling stones do gather a lot of moss these days.
In our Citizen’s United corporatocracy, I’m not sure I want a (soon-to-be) public company to have this kind of access to all my information. Everything I “like.” Everything I click on. Every story I read or post has built a profile of who I am, and probably what I’m likely to buy. I’m not ready to have my profile be just one more commodity up for grabs on the stock exchange. I am a person, not just a consumer.
So keep an eye out for some exciting things coming your way!
Luckily there are stores that open just during homecoming season where you can find those priceless gems .
I should explain something first: The warning "beep" that tells me my lights are on when I exit the vehicle no longer works. I put on all the lights when it's snowing or raining really heavy like it was today. Twice this winter I had to get Gord to "boost" me at different locations of city. He kept on saying we should get this fixed.. never did. Today....while it was raining I was well aware of NOT turning on the lights....because sure as hell I would forget to turn them off. I had three different stops to make .. and at the last one at Safeway I turned off my windshield wipers before I went in ... or so I thought. I have no idea why I would turn off the windshield wipers because ...hey they stop all on there own when you turn the truck off. Fudge..... I turned the stinking lights on. Wrong switch...
... It combines an easy-to-follow article-by-article commentary on the TRIPs Agreement with a theoretical scholarly analysis that makes of it an invaluable resource to all those who wish to understand industrial property rights at a deeper level. Lawyers, judges, scholars and government officials will find an abundance of information and legal analysis here that will help them identify antitrust issues and solutions to problems of trade secrets posed by the implementation of the TRIPs Agreement".The IPKat, being a believer in the interdependence of industrial property and antitrust law, needed little convincing about the central core of the author's thesis. Nor did he need reminding that international exhaustion of IP rights is not the end of the world for IP owners, who are perfectly capable of achieving measures of protection even when they cannot prevent their own lawfully-made products coming back home to roost. Accordingly he was naturally sympathetic to this book -- which goes way beyond the narrow themes suggested by "undisclosed information" alone. He is also impressed at the trouble that the author has taken in looking over the parapet of international IP law and fixing his analytical gaze on real provisions of national law and indeed literature.
I tried this paint/primer for the first time and I have to say, I'm pretty happy with it.
For today, we will talk about “Win Factor #1: Self-Awareness.”
The never ending propaganda against our ISI continues unabated. Today a famous British educational institution London School of Economics has joined the campaign by publishing a report stating that Pakistan ISI has strong links with the Afghan Taliban groups. The report is published by Matt Waldman of Carr Center for Human Rights Policy, Kennedy School of Government, Harvard University. By the way Matt is Jew. I wonder why all things get to Jews. Nothing personal here Matt! Am just sharing facts unless you deny it.
The taste has been balanced well – the slightly sharp taste of the cream cheese is tempered with the addition of whipped cream. This cheesecake is pretty heavy, so a moderate slice would go a long way. I’d say, this is a great way of exercising my chance at baby steps. But of course, I can’t wait to try the real deal next time. Successfully, I mean.
I call our weekly outing Treasure-hunting Tuesday. The concept is quite simple. The women in my family get together every week or so to explore a quaint antique shop, and then to have coffee, tea, or dinner.
The planet, found by astronomers at the University of California, Santa Cruz, and the Carnegie Institution of Washington, is orbiting in the middle of the "habitable zone" of the red dwarf star Gliese 581, which means it could have water on its surface.
Paper: Nutmeg mini deck by Cosmo Cricket.
Can you imagine what that would do to him?
Classification: Producer, Rap Artist, & Engineer
Flipreads also hopes to provide a venue to publishers and authors to bring previously out-of-print titles back into circulation. Since everything is online, these titles will also be available to an international market.
In an entertainment driven society, that has increasing difficulty giving prolonged attention to anything, solitude and silence are rare. Jesus accused the Pharisee’s of burdening the people with the Sabbath instead of allowing them to rest as God had intended (Mark 2:27). Willard uses the principle of the Sabbath in the same way that the writer of Hebrews referred to it as a way of entering God’s “rest” (Hebrews 4:8-11). These disciplines that lead to Sabbath as a way of life are solitude, silence, and fasting. This is a pragmatic step towards “allowing the reality of God to stand in the midst of your life” (36). Strengthening the soul through silence and solitude has a profoundly new age feel to it, but the idea is not that one lends to a Buddhist tradition of transcending oneself. In reality a person will see the world moving on without them, and a realization of who they really are and who God really is. In Willard’s words, “theological integrity and spiritual vitality” cannot exist outside of one another. Someone with no understanding of who God is will find thinking of who God is an act of futility and perhaps even frustration. Jesus often spoke of truth and, in fact, was the authority for knowledge of God. This is where theological study of the Bible and others who have studied it comes into play.
"I can't help noting that no cultures in the world that I have ever heard of make such a fuss about bedtimes, and no cultures have so many adults who find it so hard either to go to sleep or wake up. Could these social facts be connected? I strongly suspect they are."
This was Alexander’s first victory over the Persians. It would take two more, along with several hard-fought sieges, before Alexander would earn the title of “Great”. Granicus was perhaps his most dangerous battle; in that Alexander was very nearly killed. Had he not been saved from a blow from behind by Cleitus the Black, commander of his bodyguard, Alexander III of Macedon would be remembered today as but a footnote in history!
The samples have stacked up and I have won several blog giveaways recently too, so that made it EXTRA awesome!
Where often with politically-inspired music, one or the other – the music or the politics – hijacks the whole to the detriment of the other, Checkpoint 303 manage to tread the line deftly. The message is strong, the music is, on the whole, pretty great.
The incense of God’s testimony is Christ. If we take our eyes off Jesus and how He lives and His demonstration at the cross we will be decieved and the storms will rage slowly building a veil and a stony heart. Eat the bread of God’s love which feeds us and inspires us to pray. Lectio Divina.
INDICATORS ALL POINT TO AN ETHIOPIAN OFFENSIVE
So yes on the go once again and Phi Theta Kappa has started up as well for the community college. So super busy we just finished up the two of the orientations for this semester pretty soon it will be routine meetings and more committees. Back to my oldish routine ready for the next round. Hopefully more art too. ;)
I joined a new group on Paper Craft Planet and am so excited about all the new challenges and inspiration. I love making 3D projects and Adele at AR Creations has some beautiful templates. Adele posted a tutorial on making a card that looks like a men's suit. My version is much larger, my son wanted to put a couple of things inside for his Dad. What do you think?
David’s psalm honors both Saul and Jonathan as fallen heroes. David not only restrains himself from speaking ill of the dead, he honors Saul and Jonathan as war heroes, as men worthy of respect and honor. Who would have thought of Saul as someone worthy of respect? David did and we should look at those we disagree with honor and respect. It is a tough thing but a lesson that we could all stand to learn from David here.
I'm not sure that The Hunger Games is as amazing as the hype had led me to believe, but it is a very good book, and it was a lot better than the book blurb and my reading taste came together to expect.
Nicely done vid.
In case you are wondering...Lego Creationary is really fun!
"Now I know that you're drunk!"
It’s always about the work and the writing. Get out there, get your work out there, get feedback, become a better writer, learn about the craft of writing, try new techniques in your own stories, read everything you can in the genre in which you write, build your own buzz, join groups, visit every site you can and make comments. You can do it.
Justice department spokesperson Tlali Tlali said although the master has not finalised his investigation into the trust, “significant ground has been covered”.
What kind of love has the power to heal us – mind, body, and spirit? The only kind of love that has the power to heal all of us of our broken hearts is the power of God’s love (Matthew 11:28-30). Our bodies may not be healed of any physical infirmities, but our mind and spirit can be. Physical infirmities due to circumstances in life are things we must learn to live with; that does not mean that prayer is not to be offered to the Lord for a physical healing, but it does mean until the Lord grants it (assuming He does) we must live with it.
Brain imaging techniques made it possible to identify ischaemic strokes, which constitute almost nine out of ten of all strokes, and therefore determine which patients might benefit from the use of thrombolytic, or clot-busting, therapy. Such treatment carries with it a risk of bleeding, something that must be avoided at all costs in haemorrhagic stroke patients.
• The first and most important thing to remember about pet stains is to do something about them immediately. The longer you wait to clean the spot, the more it can stain/ the worse it will smell.
Did my plans materialise? Not on your life.LOL! I turned 27 last month, I am not married, I don’t have any kids and most importantly, I am not living anywhere near China. So what have the last 10 years looked like? here are some highlights that came to mind today:
Please let me introduce myself: My full name is: Forrestrose’s Jacob of York (inofficially of course; that’s at least what Mommy says since I had such an ugly name she had to change it) – in short – Jake. For the documents: I am in fact a pure bred Maine Coon male with all the papers…
Following Charlotte Mason’s approach to art appreciation the girls quietly studied a print of this work and then orally narrated what they remembered in the picture. I read a short biography and they wrote their biography on our Famous Impressionist Biography notebooking pages.
All Rights Reserved: Satya Sarada Kandula
walks without looking back.
"The Man Who Changed His Mind" is perhaps one of the most intense horror films from the 1930s that I've come across. From the first time Boris Karloff's chain-smoking mad scientist crosses paths with Anna Lee's brilliant and independent-minded surgeon, you know things are going to end badly for more than one of the film's characters. But even with that knowledge, you're not going to guess how badly and for whom until the story is all but done unfolding. Even after nearly 75 years, this is a horror film that countless modern-day filmmakers need to study and emulate' their films would be far better for it.
Anyway, I've got a doozy of a blister. 4th finger of left hand, the finger that anchors all those big chords on those huge gut and metal strings in the bass. Owie. And with four Valentine's events to play for this weekend, it's really not a good time.
2. What Deaner Was Talkin' About 2:13
sound of a children’s choir drifts in around halfway through, and some semblance
It might be an illusion.
Map & Paul (the plumber) go for pints.
He is fortunate to live
New teachers, new friends... Their anxiety grew!
We now know that senior elements of, and agencies within, the government were taking a deep – and secret – interest in cases of potentially unusual disease and death in the U.S. animal population in the 1940s and 1950s.
When Adoniram Judson entered Burma in July, 1813 it was a hostile and utterly unreached place. William Carey had told Judson in India a few months earlier not to go there. It probably would have been considered a closed country today - with anarchic despotism, fierce war with Siam, enemy raids, constant rebellion, no religious toleration. All the previous missionaries had died or left.
Expelling a student who clearly has behavioral issues to roam the streets and not receive the right guidance and support does not make the community safer, it passes that youth down a path that may be only lined with destructive opportunities and no improvements.
Sunbury Heights Primary School
more soon
The ones who accept direct submissions will have submission guidelines on their website. These will state what each editor is seeking and what is needed in terms of query letter, synopsis, outline, etc.
this year i will try to complete my 1973 topps set (15 cards to go) and maybe pick up a 1959 topps koufax to finish my dodger set from that year. and with my budget, mint cards need not apply.
Cols. Michael, Patrick Barrett Registered Wisconsin Auctioneers # 63 – 354 – 369
I hope this will give you a wee incentive to get stamping - it really can be a lot of fun...If you call back in a day or two I'll show you some of the bits & pieces I've made with some stamps
The Rebel Angel series reveals a plot which is epic and sprawling, and Bloodstone is a book you need to read in one sitting or you will get lost if you let too much time pass between readings. Philip creates a fine balance between Sithe and human worlds – merging and separating them as skilfully as a painter wielding a brush, telling intensely personal stories against the backdrop of greed, loyalty, power and love. As you are captivated by the words and the story, you will find yourself on the edge of your seat, wondering who to trust, who to believe in, as the author weaves a rich tapestry filled with characters that are both beguiling and enchanting. Don’t blame me if your brain becomes addled, your gut mangled and your heart wrenched whilst reading Bloodstone – it is a book of pure bewitchment, and one which never lets the reader off lightly.
Admirals. Three Silver Stars on each Epaulette, arid Three Rows of Lace on the Sleeves.
The material chosen here is fantastic, and perfectly suited to the Harper's tastes and abilities. The lead off track "Cowboy" is an exceptional song, the best on the album. It's a rollicking ride across the old west, with a big bold trumpet section, flutes and a fantastic vocal performance from Scoppetone. Other highlights are the Ragtime throwbacks "Society Strut" and "Down at Papa Joe's", the Spector-meets-Nilsson tropicalia vibe of "Banana King Louie" and the stunningly mellow and jazzy "Speak Low". The band didn't write any of the material here, mostly choosing songs from old movie soundtracks and lesser known songs from contemporary songwriters, but again, it's stuff that suits this band perfectly.
It stands to reason that cognitive impairment also may impede recovery from alcoholism, although evidence has not conclusively shown this to be the case. For example, Morgenstern and Bates (4) studied whether deficits in a patient’s learning and planning abilities-core aspects of many treatment strategies-affected recovery from alcoholism. They found that impairment was not a significant predictor of poor treatment response. On the other hand, evidence does support the possibility that brain damage, whether resulting from or predating alcohol use, may contribute to the development and progression of alcoholism (5).
"PHEW"
This honestly makes me sick.
If ye'll only give me Rum!
and wonderful memories.
She was classy, dignified, and certainly very principled in her beliefs. Unlike many today, she did not waiver for the sake of party unity. If she felt it was wrong, it was still wrong--even if her party openly waffled on any given subject.
It may be cliché, but it really is nice to just be nominated! Thank you!
10pm - Sam Mellon and The Skylarks
We arrived at the bodega and first grabbed some eggs and butter for the blondies. Then we wandered through the aisles, trying to figure out the best flavor combo and giggling all the way. We ended up getting a wide selection of sweet and salty treats including: pretzels, Twix bars, Potato Stix and Skor bars (like Heath bars) as our flavorings, plus we knew Lauren had some honey roasted peanuts at home that we could consider.
This time, we wondered if we had encountered the next generation of bighorn sheep on bike, since we saw these same creatures over a decade ago in the same vicinity, Lake Minnewanka. Except last time it was in the quiet winter stillness when we were safely protected in our car. There were no other tourists around us at that time.
To see him, aged twenty years in only two, you had to wonder what had been going on in the man’s life. I confess I was glowing inside.
Very proper it was.
That's all for now, I will try to sit down and write Part 3 to my time capsule posts tonight.
1 neglected
Peeved: We are not shopping for skinny jeans. We are going to get out of the car, go directly to the purses, select three purses, pay for them and leave. Understood?
Journal Notes:
Then there are things that you should never attempt. I have to admit though, the things that happen in anime that you should never learn and apply in real life is a much longer list than the first one. (They just have to add in those weird parts don’t they) Of course most of us have the direct sense to know that certain things just cannot happen, but let’s see how entertaining it can get if I were to list some of them.
- racism addressed on tv
Ebags and Gladrags
* 1 tsp coffee
Now I have to be careful here, as I many friends who love Sams and would probably never have a bad word to say about it. Sams has everything going for it, the location in old lifeboat house gives it both character and a glorious view. However, it’s popularity has a downside. We booked for Sunday lunch but the earliest table was 3 in the afternoon. On balance we decided we were happy with this. A late brunch, a walk and arriving at three on a winter’s afternoon would suit us perfectly. However, they should have warned us that the menu offering was likely to be depleted by then.
In the moment of personal recognition of your so-called “error”, you, in that very same moment, have moved forward a little bit in terms of EXPERIENTIAL GROWTH. This is the primary function and purpose of the physical environment.
We stayed in the hospital until Saturday morning ( had the option to stay until Sunday but I was moving around much more than expected so they gave us the OK to leave early) The stay in the hospital was a little rough.. my emotions and stress level were through the roof and we had a LOT of visitors which was at times a little overwhelming for me. Being home has been great, he's a great eater, sleeper and just all around an easily appeasable baby. I hope this continues!! My recovery has been a little slower than I'd like. I had forgotten about little things like gas pains and it's been a bitch to sit down and stand up... I'm sooooo bruised as well. Again, all worth it when I look at Mac!!!
THE NEWS
“Tell your friend that Algar has to cancel their dinner date this weekend. He’s been called back to the Dark Country,” Declan’s voice flowed through the microphone like smooth jazz.
Why can't we all just play nice?
There are a lot of ways you can organize your closet, but the main thing is that it works for you.
Combine the pineapple and the maple syrup in a heavy bottomed saucepan and bring to a boil. Lower to simmer and simmer until tender, about 10 minutes. Remove from heat and allow to set 30 minutes. After 30 minutes, place the mixture in a bowl of a food processor fitted with a metal blade. Pulse until chopped coarsely; set aside.
The leaves may not look like much now, but tulips are another favourite, particularly when they dance in the breeze. This fondness may well relate to my youth in Ottawa and the magnificent Tulip Festival held every year.
The quality is good and the website is very well optimised, this is why it costs so much money to read. These days people like reading pay for access media on their special computers because they like stuff like that and they see it as a good investment. Many people statistically invest 5% of their earned money online and reinvest in information. The most popular Bing news, alternative news. Stirring Trouble Internationally is an alternative news site where you can read a lot of stuff about websites and such.
The most glamorous night – oh, okay, the only glamorous night – in the Scottish jazz calendar is the Glasgow Jazz Festival’s fundraising ball. This year’s event took place on Thursday and it was very unusual to be wearing a full-length gown, rather than jeans, while hanging out with jazzers.
Scotia Association of Library Technicians.
To deal with this latest revenue crisis, the M.T.A. has decided to take subsidized Metrocards from NYC school children. This supposedly will save $140 million annually.
“I’ll bet you $5 bucks 5 De Mayo is NOT Mexican Independence Day!”
It’s time to come clean.
my kids did and Honey was a bit baffled but not disappointed;
So here’s the promised picture, taken by a neighbor in front of his house, with me posing awkwardly and squinting into the sun …
“Lieutenant?” The soldier she’d handed the letter to yesterday stood before her. “You’re my relief?”
(1) Propaganda attacking Falun Gong that originates from the Communist Party has been spread seemingly everywhere, leading to bigotry and suspicion toward the Falun Gong internationally. While much of this situation has been rectified as people have gotten to know those who practice Falun Gong and what the discipline stands for, the effects of this smear campaign, which began in 1999, can still be felt today.
I wish we could move with our own furniture though. Our furniture is in a storage back in the States. If we stay overseas for 10 years, for example, that’s how long we will not see our furniture (there are some exceptions, but a majority of the houses are furnished) and that’s a long time to live without your favorite furniture! I understand that it is more cost-effective. The sizes of the housing we get at each post vary, so it makes sense to keep housing furnished by the office.
Creditors of oldco cannot stop it. The administrators have the power to sell the assets of the company in administration.
*Brads - Basic Grey
This challenge requires a Crafty Pad image to participate.
Listen to Me:
Much shorter. There are assignment operators for addition, subtraction, multiplication and division.
As you might be aware I am Deputy Editor of The Great Toy Guide, which is a fantastic site where we take toys and give them to our own children. Our children are really lovely, but they DO like to do things like dunk toys in orange juice. They send action figures on missions that involve being thrown down the stairs. They pull, prod and shake things just to see what happens. And when they’re done, they leave their toys on the floor for passing adults to stand on.
Oh. My. God. What. The. Hell.
Although using lightweight alternatives for network services of the Nano-box has been my device until now, I must say that I could not find an alternative to the good old Squid as HTTP Transparent Proxy. Squid3 is stable and fast, and reasonably easy to configure as well. At least you can find tons of examples and help from Internet. There are many other HTTP proxies available in the Linux Mint software repository. I tried a few of them. They all hampered the overall performance of the final system.
It's the unexpected that amazes me all the time when stepping into our surrounding nature.
10:45 Morning coffee
A muscle worked in her dad's jaw. Sam knew she had to change the subject - and fast. "Mr. Poppet, can you get Mum and bring her here? We need to talk to her."
It tastes like the smell, it is a slightly nutty and hoppy red ale, all signs point to good, then it hits me... This is a rip off of Stones Arrogant Bastard. It is less bold and in your face, but all the flavor components are there. From the upfront bite of hops, to the basic nutti-ness, to the clean slight citrus finish. Its all there. And not that I don't understand that there are only so many ingredients that you can fit in a beer, but this is almost vagrant. Even the name, Juggernaut, Arrogant Bastard, Juggernaut, Arrogant Bastard... so damn close. Pyramid, what the hell are you doing?
We can choose how these circumstances form us. One option is the “Why me?” position which leads to the fortification of insecurity and pride. The other is to let our heart be broken. When your heart is broken, the Light can shine into it and out from it. Love can enter and love can be set free. Psalm 42 helps me understand this process today… and it brought forth this prayer:
If we were to star in a real variety show, I think I’d do the best because the other members are really shy, hahaha. I’m the caring type so I’d just embrace everyone.
pinch of fresh black pepper
If this recession continues much longer, or even grows worse (aka the double dip), then we’ll see real public anger. The political map may change in ways we cannot now imagine.
I've been getting into more of a routine as I've figured out my schedule a little bit more. I usually get up around 6:00 A.M. each school day. This gives me time to read my scriptures and eat breakfast before I head to school by 7:15 on Tuesdays and Thursdays. Mondays and Wednesdays I use a treadmill, bike, or elliptical machine in the gym on the first floor our our building while reading. I leave for school on Mondays and Wednesdays around 9:00. In every spare minute I have, I am constantly reading. The time I take commuting to Evanston on the "L" is always homework time, reading for one of my classes. My assignments for all of my classes makes it so that I'm reading anywhere from 150-200 pages a night. I try to skim where I can, but it's harder to get the gist of scholarly journals if you aren't paying close attention. I'm figuring out the balance though.
In addition to the foregoing General Objections, Plaintiff objects to Interrogatory No. 9 on the grounds that it is overbroad, unduly burdensome, calls for information that is not relevant to the claim or defense of any party, and calls for information that is protected by the attorney-client privilege and the attorney work product doctrine.
The Church has an important role in helping young - and not so young - people from being tempted into taking their own lives. The God we believe in is pure love. He seeks the best for all this creatures, regardless of whatever weaknesses or problems they may have - regardless of whatever sins we have committed. It is our belief that God wants all people to know Him, love Him and serve Him in this world and be happy with Him forever in the next (cf The Penny Catechism).
The random Lucky winner will have a chance to win a prize!! Awesome isn't it... The beauty of this challenge is ~ you have a month ..plenty of time to play eh...
This recipe makes a lot of salad! We have a big family so this isn't a problem. You can easily cut the recipe in half though. It is great served warm or cold. We like it topped with a diced hard-boiled egg.
This time we will utilize our "open house" schedule for the first 3 stops. This means that we will be punching tickets at the first 3 stops for three hours so you can enjoy a beer at each stop with only a quarter of the people crammed into each establishment. You will get your ticket at whichever stop you decide to visit first. But, VERY IMPORTANT, we will only be handing out the tickets between 6pm and 7pm. Thus, you still need to start between 6 and 7. Then, at 9pm, everybody will gather at one final stop and that is where we will award the super special Pub Crawl glasses-the prize for making all 4 stops! And as always, designated drivers are both eligible for the award and encouraged to attend (Root Beer available!)!
“OK,” The Agent said. “We can’t keep DD#1 like this. I’ll call the no-kill shelters. They'll take her and find a home for her.”
What if I didn’t have my loved ones to reach out to when things got hard, when things go wrong? What if I was all alone in this messy thing called life? As I was pacing in my room after receiving yet another spate of bad news, I reached for the phone and made a call. One of my dearest friends answered the call and walked with me in the dark. Sometimes we all need a hand in the darkness.
Just loving working with these fabrics............
It was by no means exclusively Jewish, but it was overwhelmingly so. It is also impossible to dismiss the current role of Jews within academia not to mention the Jewish anti-white propagandists within the media and, of course Hollywood.
Okay, so mostly I just started this blog to keep track of what I do each day in regards to eating, exercising, etc. And to keep track of my measurements and weigh-ins. So here is my Standard Form:
I love both of the characters! They are amazing in their own way! I loved that we got to meet both of them separately before we met them together. That way we could see them properly, rather than seeing how they act when they aren’t properly in their comfort zone.
2) Diversity is king: If you like tall women, it’s there. If you like well dressed men, it’s there. I know it’s the law of numbers at work but it felt like there really isn’t a “normal” in NYC. It was funny, I felt like a hobo one minute and like Barney Stinson all suited up the next. One of my favourite traits of New York for sure.
The following government taxes and fees apply to your international air travel:
Reishi
Huan Vu's Die Farbe, based on The Colour Out of Space, will be released on DVD and Blu-ray this Friday! You can pre-order the DVD, Blu-ray or awesomely titled Limited Specimen Edition at die-farbe.com...
As for Skeggi, he ransomed himself from the island, and went ever after on a wooden leg. But Thorkel went home with his brother Gisli, and now their friendship was pretty good, and Gisli was thought to have grown a great man by these dealings.
Questions? Please leave a comment!
white and pink —
Paper: Glorious Green, Close To Cocoa, Whisper White
Why didn’t any of the twelve apostles command the people to follow or imitate them”? Jesus Christ said to follow Him while on earth but now that He is exiled to heaven He has committed the new revelation to and through the Apostle Paul and we are told to follow him instead. (1 Corinthians 11:1)
So, the Pantomime wants to know:
My lowest and most pathetic hour
The indigenous have the calendars, and know how to accurately interpret it, not others. The Mayan Calendars comprehension of time, seasons, and cycles has proven itself to be vast and sophisticated. The Maya understand 17 different calendars, some of them charting time accurately over a span of more than ten million years. The calendar that has steadily drawn global attention since 1987 is called the Tzolk’in or Cholq’ij.
Not that I blamed him. I mean, who would? And normally we wouldn't care if someone thought we were making stuff up, but in this case, in this situation, it did matter. Because it meant that nobody was going to help us. It meant we were on our own.
I’m just a wee bit nervous ...
I WISH I could say I have read all, of last week's poems. I have not, but I do plan on trying to get caught up. We are doing a home improvement project. I'm the squirrel running around getting this and that, and moving my stash of art supplies,not nuts. This is my latest news... I don't think it would make a good poem. Pick something that speaks to you news wise and see where it takes you and us! I look forward to your poems! I hope you like the daily, no timely prompt ;D
We were so glad that the Dunne family could come out and enjoy some time with us. We swam in the rain, since the weather wasn't cooperating. We also had Brian cook some hotdogs and ate lunch together. We felt bad they drove the whole way out to us, and then the weather wasn't so great. :( But we definitely appreciated them coming out and the kids had a blast! Since the weather wasn't great, these are the only pictures I got to document that we really did have visitors! My poor camera had some issues over our stay. It got fogged up from the heat and humidity/moisture.
i know, i know. i'm bad at updating them fast. but i still really appreciate them!
8) Surprised to receive a letter from William Fritzley's sweetheart (he was my maternal grandfather) from his days at an Army base in Kentucky. Even more surprised, and grateful, that she sent pictures of him from 1941!
One would think the party that claims it's for limited government would consider ending the very place where big government indoctrination starts. However, that isn't the case in the 2012 Missouri Republican party platform.
P.S. on a completely un-related note, I'm wearing my dress backwards in these photos. I didn't like the way the dress looked originally so I thought it'd be fun to reverse it and have a modest neckline. I'm quite pleased with the result. Now I'm off to see what else I can wear in reverse ;-)
Or if he had
The one major thing I got pissed off on regarding this entire process was how much LACK of help there was from the employees. I had to track down someone to get me a fish, I specifically asked some basic questions. And I got LAUGHED at.
What is zero-gravity expansion in a binomial function tied to its roots?
First they (the investment banks) took money from the investors on the false pretenses that the bonds were real when anyone with 6 months experience on Wall street could tell you this was not a bond for lots of reasons, the most basic of which was that there was no borrower. The prospectus had no loans because there were no loans made yet. The banks certainly wouldn’ t take the risks posed by this toxic heap of loans, so they were waiting for the investors to get conned. Once they had the money then they figured out how to keep as much of it as possible before even looking for residential home borrowers.
This time it was a postcard from Feargal while he was in Toronto, massively delayed by volcanic ash!
And they don’t even have to wear caps and gowns! The girls wear white dresses (and I didn’t ask what they guys wear but I’m guessing slacks and a dress shirt). They have their graduation mid-May and gowns would just be too hot.
Now she is in bed, eyes closed, circled by soft toys like a portrait in oil. She usually asks for more milk at this point, but since she is usually asleep by the time I come back, I no longer come back. Tonight she says. “You don’t normally bring the milk, do you daddy?” I grin guiltily and wonder when she started noticing.
“Did that really happen?” Geoff asked. Trent stuck his hands in his pockets and fidgeted, and he did pull out the fingertip that he cut off.
"I drew all 39 candles, Mommy!", he happily announced. Out loud, I said, "Wow! That's great, buddy!" In my head, I said, "Damn! That's a lot of candles!"
Photo courtesy of Geoff Mayes Media
Curly fro. Plait or corn-row hair for a day or so and then undo it. Black History Month Poetry Reading. Tokyo, 2010.
School of Life Sciences, Devi Ahilya University, Vigyan Bhavan, Indore, India. genetics@bom4.vsnl.net.in
Dumaresq brought to his storytelling a combination of psychological honesty, graphic physical loathing, and a whimsical, irreverent quality that revels in the absurd, the weird and the bizarre. He was raised a Roman Catholic by his staunchly religious mother, as Howard Gerwing, Dumaresq's friend and the publisher of his novels, recalls: “Bill was a Roman Catholic and his mother was very influential in that, she was always after him. He used to pretend to go to church but we'd be down the coffee shop instead, and after it was over he'd go tell his mother he'd been to Mass.” Gerwing met Dumaresq when the two were employed at the same Vancouver cinema. He recalls, “Bill was working at the Varsity Cinema up on Tenth Avenue, on the door, but actually he ran the whole place because the manager was a hopeless drunk. Bill did everything for him. That's how I met him. I was the poster boy at the cinema, I would put up posters and change the marquee.” Dumaresq was in Vancouver studying English at the University, and formed a lifelong love of poetry through the influence of an English professor there who turned him on to John Milton. His other great loves were the theatre, and cinema. Gerwing remembers that Dumaresq had a particular affection for the Hollywood Musical: “We'd be sweeping out the Varsity and he'd be up on stage singing and dancing while I was doing the sweeping! I'd be clapping and he'd bow and then go off into another Fred Astaire routine. He knew all the song and dance routines from the Musicals. He would sing all the parts to you for Kiss Me Kate! His memory was superb.”
Dedication: “To MY CHILDREN’S CHILDREN and to their Children with the Reminder that their patriotic Forebears were among the brave Men North and South who both counselled against and fought in the American Civil War.” (See Item B-1, above.)
The pancakes have chopped cherries in them and are topped with cooked cherries and a delicious vanilla bean glaze. SO GOOD!
I managed to give her a bright smile. I patted her arm warmly and told her carelessly not to worry, that things will work out just the way she wanted them to. I told her she had a great plan, and that she was on top of things. I encouraged her imagination, and soothed her soul. It was very important for her to be acknowledged. She will never change… not for me and not even for herself.
So I was thrilled when HarperCollins decided to republish the trilogy in one omnibus edition. We knew the three books were a bit too long to publish in one volume without some cuts – but, rather than weeping over this, I welcomed it. I could go back and sort out some of the things I’d been itching to put right! Yay! And another advantage of having all three books in one volume was that I could do away with the explanatory material every author has to include in the early pages of sequels so that new readers (who may not have read the other books) will understand who these characters are, and something of their back-story.
floral wallpaper be gone!
The Canon and I had some good times. It's not my fault that technology changed, and it was showing its age. I'm not an ogre. We can still hang out sometimes, if it wants. If I have time. But mostly it's time to move on.
Just a bit about the buildings being demolished for this planned development:
338(That cause of all my guilt, and all my joy)
A beautiful town, Eklingji attracts thousands of devotees and visitors throughout the year.
But the Americans will think twice before they anger the MerkeSchauble. Geopolitically, a strong EU remains a potential bulwark against the megalomaniac on the other side of the Urals. And financially, they will be dead soon after the arrival of any debt Tsunami from an EU implosion.
I never made it to the birthing tub. About 45 minutes after my water was broken I delivered a baby. 4cm to push! I ran naked as a jay bird from the bathtub to the bed. Admittedly I may have behaved a little insanely when it came to the pushing part (yelling, and carrying on a bit), but it was a new experience for me. And more important than being a little nuts during delivery is that I, we, had a healthy, robust, beautiful baby boy. We were able to deliver him the way we wanted to. He was loud and red and perfect.
I particularly loved this article with fashionable barrister Dixie Coulton on her eclectic wardrobe. So often when a UK magazine celebrates a woman as a fashion icon it is usually some actress/model/heiress/popstrel/rockstar/fashion insider or, most irritatingly, a trustafarian with a dream creative career in aforementioned categories on the back of having rich or famous parents. These are women who have designers and stylists on speed dial and who seem to do nothing but swan from one glamourous party to the next getting papped. But how about this for a new concept? To feature (gasp!) a modern career woman who works! Yes successful lawyers in the over fifty age bracket have style credentials too! Who would have thought?
“Want” and “Need,” don’t confuse the two
Records show Beauchamp was arrested five times between 1995 and 2010, on charges ranging from armed robbery to marijuana possession.
is some divine inspired boarder
The Secretary of Defense with respect to water resources; and
And of course no good contemporary is complete without its sweet boys (one of which is a surfer)! The romance was adorable, but it also didn't take away from the surprisingly touching plot. You get to grow to love each of the characters just like you do with Izzie and Mira, and the benefit of this being a standalone is that you get a nicely wrapped up ending.
I decided to share a previous reject card. Apologies, if I’ve shared this already. Anymore, when I submit to publication calls, which is rare, I only make projects that I think I will use. It makes no sense to make something that won’t get used if it’s not picked up (and I’ve been in a dry spell as far as publication acceptances).
Since I am in the food industry... more specifically the baking and pastry industry... we are not allowed to take off for the holidays. It's our busiest season, and most important season. How else do you all expect the people of Bremerhaven to get their Christmas Stollen, Baumkuchen and Lebkuchen?
Hubby is the creative one in the family so before you knew it, we had a poor, stuffed dude being crushed by Little Man's ride-on tractor, a front lawn full of tombstones, a floating witches hat and other spooky bits and bobs.
HSAA advises people with hearing loss to not disclose their disability in the initial application; however, once granted an interview, it is best to communicate your needs clearly and request any necessary accommodations. In all cases, it is important to focus on your valuable skills and experience – not your hearing loss. Be confident and show how you can be an asset to the organization.
I discovered my love of food and creating it when I was around 5 and I was taking everything out of my mom's pantry and throwing it into a giant pot of boiling water and calling it soup.
The power to seek the beauty was available.
13. Antena - Easy Street
Sound familiar? E@L's investment account. As previously described. All the money from the sale of his post-divorce 50% of the Olde Sweete Homee. The Prick is a total cunt. I think was can all rest our joint agreement there.
If you don’t know who this fantastic person is, read her so amazing blog. She’s losing lots of followers and she might some more. Though highly doubtful you’ll like what you read…
So the kids have broken up for the Easter holidays, the jumble sale, coffee morning, school discos and parents evenings are all behind me, and I can relax and enjoy some peace and quiet. Yeah, right....
The first up with a suggestion was Anton The Italian. She regularly posts up yummy looking pix of food that she has prepared and she suggested the following:
Update: we only made it to the Red Sea - again.
So that I can let them freely drop
M: “I think I better stop.”
Hello & Happy Thursday!
I use Twitter to share information I have found useful generally by posting a link or re-tweeting a tweet containing a link so that the original twitterer gets due credit. I use Google Reader to subscribe to several blogs – several of which are autism related – and I then pass on any links I think people will appreciate. I hope people are deriving benefit I am on several people’s lists so I think I must be doing some good. I also use Twitter to comment on life and to ask questions. I really appreciate people who tweet useful links – some perhaps for commercial reasons – people can be very generous with their time and knowledge.
3.concern or anxiety; solicitude: a fear for someone’s safety.
So when individuals started to talk to me about this situation I was actually somewhat surprised to find out that such a “registry’ is not already in existence! Because my initial reaction was, “what is everyone so upset about, don’t we already have a coaches registry?”. What I discovered, however, is that a registry apparently doesn’t exist. So it’s clearly about time that the sport develop one. Unfortunately, it’s been the delivery of the concept to the coaches, and the rationale for the need of a registry, where “leadership” has dropped the ball.
7B. The Urban Environment – TEL 236
To celebrate the launch of Hookedoncraft's challenge blog we are offering a Blog Candy giveaway. Once we reach 100 followers we will do a random prize draw and the lucky winner will receive all this!
Anyhow, this is your typical revenge plot movie. Except here, a group of CIA agents left for dead band together and vow to get back at everyone. And they do it with such panache, too. Enter a hot agent chick with her own agenda (Saldana) who wants to help them and everyone’s thinking double-cross. Part of the fun is trying to guess who’s actually playing on what side.
$1520 ÷ 14 days (approximately) = $108 to save each day
And then, my ex-boyfriend. The one I was so in love with. The one I wanted to live with side by side for the rest of my days. The one who broke me into a million little pieces.
7. Ebony (eliminated)
I think that next time I have an appointment with Dr. DeVil, I will bring along the Spouse Sparrow, and then she can see him turn bright purple and stutter in embarrassment and maybe then she will go off him.
Last week, after listening to David Woodbridge’s podcast where he walked me through using Googlevox with Samnet, my interest was peeked again. I went back to Googlevox, and was pleasantly surprised by the improvements Google had made in their latest update to GoogleVox. It took some time, but I took the tutorial and played around with GoogleVox learning a lot of the keyboard shortcuts. I then signed up for a free trial of Samnet. Samnet is pretty simple for use even for someone who is blind and not a computer whiz. You can easily navigate the entire site using the tab, shift, arrows, and enter keys. I of course have learned some quicker ways to navigate the site, as I am impatient and a much more advanced computer user.
except for roads and bridges and defense and
Okay, before I show you the samples from the design team, let me give a congrats to our random winners from our Mojo Monday 200 celebration! We had just over 300 entries, so that means we have 6 prizes to give away! Here are the lucky winners...
Scousers, unlike the rest of the UK do not stick their arses up in the air for the government or any other establishment mefs we stand and fight our corner. This emasculates the general population of UK into realising they are fortune’s bitches because they would sooner take it up the wrong-un than stand and fight. Jealous? I think so.
Calories:262 (34% from fat)
rate that stubbornly hangs around 7 percent...
Put It On -- Bob Marley
Several years ago as network television was losing viewers to cable and the internet, one commentator lamented the loss of moments of collective consciousness that had been created by television shows like The Cosby Show, Friends, and the X-Files. According to this commentator the large audiences these shows commanded enabled a series of ideas and topics to filter into society-at-large, weaving threads of common knowledge into a broad and diverse population. Without these shows, he wondered, would we lose these collective moments, would the quilt of society become just a collection of fabric scraps?
"What do you mean?" (internally giggles.)
But for now, let’s just plow on ahead.
I sold these and tons of other stuff like my shoes, handbags, bean bags, TV Cabinet, dining table, trampoline, toaster, rice cooker, printer, vacuum cleaner, broom, laundry basket, study desk, wall clock, and matress. Semua licin!
Peter Weir has a really diverse record of good movies. The Mosquito Coast, Master and Commander, The Truman Show. Hard to imagine a wider range of completely watchable movies.
Scalloped oval: Elegant Edges Cricut cartridge cut at 3 1/2" (page 50 of the handbook)
I look forward to making many more treasured memories. Here's to many more good times as I am a parent of young adults!!
delayed reaction to stress?
Crowded House
Despite starting work at 11am yesterday, I take the 9am train to Central Station and walk the 13 minutes to TITLE in Surry Hills, a store that specialises in music, photography and film, which also doesn’t open til 10. Yesterday was their Record Store Day, and despite the measly 20% off vinyls (I would have obviously preferred a greater reduction), I was eager to peruse the store for their hopefully rare and valuable albums missing from my collection. I don’t get here enough, though I don’t get to any of my favourite haunts enough, but today I felt was a no exception case to spend what precious time I have browsing for records before heading back to the unflattering real world and selling knives (not an entirely poor alternative, seeing as it is a sexier sounding day-job than McDonalds (no offence to those who work there)).
In 2009, I was diagnosed with hyperthyroidism and Graves Disease - which is an auto-immune disease. I was on antithyroid medicine for about a year and a half and now the doctor is recommending Radioactive iodine therapy. I've chosen to do this because it is a safer option then continuing the medicine I'm on now. This option means being on medicine for the rest of my life (and if you're wondering- yes, I'm only 24). It scares me a little, but I know this is the best option for my long term health.
Food processor or spice grinder
The base that mosaic tiles are adhered to is called a substrait.
“We can never be sure there will be no additional profit being made,” said Mr. Sikorski of Barclays Capital.
Instead of more apologies, shame, and silence, this John Patrick Shanley play put some nuance into the priest abuse scandal. There were no easy answers here, no clear way to point fingers or to find a path to salvation. What was present, however, was an insightful study of human nature and an amazing performance from Cherry Jones.
On my current client, I am using Microsoft SQL Server 2008 R2 and SSIS, Integration Services.
About the Book: Just some of the reviews below… “a well-done collection of simple, useful recipes…” “…a nice-sized collection of recipes for anyone no matter what your tastes might be…” “There is as much accent on healthy diet as on fast cooking. ” “…I love this book, the ingredients used in the recipes are not hard to find…” This is an easy book to read with quick and easy dinner recipes and lunch recipes that you can use and repeat all year round. You don’t need 100′s of recipes to overwhelm you – just get over 2 months supply of vegetarian, gluten-free, meat and fish recipes, soups and pasta dishes, and you will have plenty of choice for meals and dinner ideas – to mix, match and add to and you will soon be cooking up quick, family favorites every week! An essential book for the kitchen, keep this book on your shelf to refer to and you can easily plan your 30 minute meals for the week or even the month!
You could always use store bought vegan (0r non, obviously) sausage, but I like to make my stuff from scratch when I can!
Appearance: Shaggy blond hair; crease between his eyebrows; green eyes
It has been a real challenge trying to think of what type of quilt would appeal to a 14 year old boy and I really hope it isn't too childish. This is just a mock-up using the collage creator to give me a feel of what it will look like. 12/35 blocks completed.
Skin: copics E11, 21 & 00 and R20
Once in a while, if we are really running late, I would cross the
(As for BridgePort, they might not yet be alarmed, but perhaps concerned. Though in truth, BridgePort's interpretation is much lighter and easier to drink in a session. You wouldn't want more than two Inversions.)
Take that, sanctimonious purists!
"It'll be fine." Sam's father squeezed her hand, but his voice shook. The flames from the skulls cast shadows across his face, making his nose appear elongated and his eyes dark, incomprehensible. Sam swallowed. Maybe he was into some creepy cult. She'd heard of such things. But, no. She shook her head. She trusted him, though this was the most bizarre thing she'd ever experienced. He gave her a gentle push toward the door.
The argument that the toll gates are required to collect tolls to improve the road network is neither here nor there. We all know that like the street light levy which we have been paying for ages, there will be no correlation between the tolls and our street conditions. That said, I believe there are better ways of raising these tolls. It is the right of every Ghanaian to drive on decent streets, the cost of which must be borne by all. Tolling particular streets is not helpful to this course. Distribute the cost among all cars, this can be charged once a year when the cars are presented at the DVLA for examination. Foreign cars that enter Ghana through the boarders can pay a road toll before they enter the country. With this arrangement, few roads will need tolling. The toll booths that surround the city of Accra like Trojan walls are unnecessary bother to citizens. Mr. Gidisu, it's time to yank them off. If the gates go, you don't have to worry about who steals the tolls. The money spent on electronic gates will be saved, and the tolls will be deposited straight into your accounts by the banks that operate at the DVLA office. The only loss I see here is that politicians will lose the opportunity to put their "foot soldiers" at the gates in the name of providing them with jobs. Even then, the money saved can be applied to expand the economy to absorb them. Please go ahead and tax away all our earnings as you please, but Koo Santana pleads for his health. The bad traffic situation in Accra is the number 1 stress factor for most of us in Accra and other cities. They may be better here than in some other countries, but we aspire towards greater heights. It is the responsibility of our elected leaders to ease this pain. Stacking us behind toll gates will only make it worse.
This puts the true church, committed to the authority of God’s Word, in a very difficult cultural position. Put simply, we cannot join the larger culture in normalizing homosexuality and restructuring society to match this new morality. Recognizing same-sex unions and legalizing same-sex marriage is central to this project.
DEUTERONOMY 8:6-7
I am putting together a fundraising plan that can earn your group 50% on subscriptions! This could mean recurring earnings for your group. WOW! Not many fundraisers do that.
Are the people of Eureka keeping a secret? I’ve never heard of anything having been discovered there. Maybe that’s where the vacuum cleaners are made. If I traveled to Reminderville I bet it would come back to me.
I began this post yesterday but these days emotional posts get me down. Today is the festival of light. A time to look within and observe the inner light. To let go of all the hurt, pain and negativity. To Believe and embrace life as it unfolds.
‘This study uncovers an ongoing “fertility paradox” in maternal health: education is the major modulator that has helped Chile to reach one of the safest motherhood in the world, but also contributes to decrease fertility, excessively delaying motherhood and puts mothers on risk because of their older age.’ Thus, an emerging problem nowadays ‘is not a question of how many children a mother has, but a question of when a mother has her children, specially the first of them’ concluded Koch.
The majority of you in the physical take almost no time to study your own inner perceptions of subtle sensations that constantly wash over you throughout your days. And yet, most of you same ones are constantly seeking greater and greater understanding of who you are. To know yourself, you need to study yourself. However, the majority of your planet’s inhabitants are at a level of learning wherein situations need to get pretty painful in order for them to seek change from the day-to-day comfort of familiarity.
To go along with the carnival animal cookies that I made in my previous post, I also made a 12 x 17 inch red velvet carnival cake. The only other time I made a cake this large was the Superman birthday cake that I made for my son Matthew, and for that cake I had used four 9 x 13 inch cakes (two side-by-side, and two on top of that for the second layer). But I was hesitant to do that again, since I felt like I could see a line down the middle where the two sets of cakes met. So this time I bought a 12 x 17 inch cake pan, so that I could make it the right way!
4. What will it take to optimize this space? Think of the resources required – time, elbow grease, a strong back, some helping hands, money, etc.
I made this for the two challenges at Splitcoast yesterday: Technique Challenge 374: Stamping Nostalgia and Clean and Simple Challenge 167: At the Zoo. . .
The twenty-ninth of October dawned,
2010.07.26 Thailand Pattani 1 0 A 55-year-old Buddhist teacher is shot to death by Islamic militants while driving home.
It appears that applicants sometimes file large collections of information for
That is all I got for now. Pretty slow I guess. Maybe things will pick up some and we can get busy.
We have 3 weeks till this little guy gets here... well I hope it's 3 weeks.. :) I'm so ready for it to be over. Don't get me wrong, I love being pregnant, I do. But I'm so ready for it to be done!!!
This year, we would like to tour and promote ourselves as much as we can in USA and Japan with the local labels there. And then I think we will rise to reach the universe from the bottom when doing the same things as we did here last year.
So be sure to check all the great "31 days" series that will be linked together and have some fun getting to know some great bloggers and learning some fun new things...:)
Am an entrepreneur with so much work. Spine, hands, eyes become stressed with a lot of sitting and typing.
1. *TNA TELEVISION CHAMPIONSHIP: Devon (Champion) vs. Bully Ray (Challenger).
St. Joseph’s whole life may be summed up as a continual adherence to the divine plan by a life of continual prayer – his was an entire consecration to the mission entrusted to him by God – but even more so in situations which were very obscure and mysterious: the perplexity aroused in his mind by Mary’s mysterious maternity, the extreme poverty and anxieties connected with Bethlehem, the threat of death on the life of the Divine Infant, and the privations during the flight into Egypt. In our life, too, there is always some mystery, either because God is pleased to work in a hidden, secret manner or because His action is always incomprehensible to our poor human intelligence. Therefore, we need also that glace of faith of St. Joseph, that completely docile and blind confidence of a child which, relying on the infinite goodness of God, convinces us that He always and in all circumstances will our good and disposes everything to that end especially for those who love Him (cf., Rom. 8.28). Only this loving trust will permit us, like St. Joseph, always to say our “yes” to every manifestation of the divine pleasures, a humble, prompt, and trustful “yes,” in spite of the obscurities, the difficulties, the mystery. Let us obey with the simplicity of St. Joseph, understanding that God can employ any person or circumstance to make us know and execute His divine plan for God always governs and directs all things toward the fulfillment of His will.
80. Dreamin' and Drinkin' -- Waylon Jennings
That brings me to Adam, a man in his early forties who could easily pass for 65. I do not know what has brought him to his present state, but his brains are truly scrambled to the extent that he cannot even remember his address. He is an unpleasant nuisance to the local community, prone to urinate and defecate in public irrespective of who might be watching. Inevitably he was given an ASBO a couple of years ago that has entirely failed to deter him; he has breached it nine times and has served numerous shortish prison sentences, sometimes reoffending on the day of his release. ASBO breach can carry up to five years at the Crown Court, and he has indeed been committed there a few times for sentence, receiving up to six months inside. And the entire process has been utterly useless in preventing him from carrying out acts that disgust innocent civilians. Many thousands of pounds have been spent on processing him through the courts and locking him up in a system that simply isn't meant to cope with the likes of him. His problem is more one for the NHS than for the prison service, but there is simply nowhere for him to go, and no money to provide any help.
(10) List out the applications of MATLAB.
I needed that reinforcement, that reminder, that I can choose........and that those choices can be good ones. Sometimes, I forget.
I appreciate your empathy and concern for the trauma I have experienced. I feel similarly for you. The bullying and self-esteem damage that the children we were experienced really wasn't okay. If I made it sound like I wished my life had gone differently I want to say I most certainly don't. I am who I am because of those experiences and once I had children I never wished to go back. My parents suffered in worse ways than me and my children have it much better than I did. I learned very much like you to overcome and deal with unpleasant life experiences. Those that knew me when I was younger have indicated they are amazed I turned out as well as I did. Yes life does throw curves but so many of those so called curves are artificial. Life is challenging enough without adding more difficulties. And I choose to play basketball rather than baseball. I may encounter defense in my desire to score but there are so many more options available that lead to success other than swinging a bat. All I need to play basketball is a ball and a hoop. I can play it with a team or by myself. Baseball doesn't work so well by yourself and usually it requires a whole bunch more players.
As I sat there taking all of this in, I suddenly began to look at each car as it’s own little world. These “worlds” varied in size as well as in personality. Some contained families and others only a few people and still others could only boast of one occupant. Each one had it’s own story; it’s own hopes and fears, problems and predicaments, joys and praises. It seemed that all of these mini worlds were in a heated race to who knows where. At a glance, one would notice only that there were hundreds of people. But, if you look deeper, you realize that there are hundreds of people, yes, but they are completely isolated.
My preferred method of pairing humans off would be to draw lots. That way everyone has an equal chance of getting a sugarplum or a lemon. The unlucky ones would obviously be disappointed, but at least they’d begin their married life with low expectations. Humans are mysterious creatures, and what initially appears to be the booby prize may turn out to be a serviceable household appliance. There might also be fewer recriminations about adultery, given that cheaters could use the line “I didn’t ask to be married to you” to mitigate their infidelities.
Bad idea.
674 ***D-VI/19/1974. “Citizenship, Prudence and the Classics.” Introduction to discussion of a paper on Lincoln’s Emancipation Proclamation. Center for the Study of Democratic Institutions, Santa Barbara, California. See Item D-IV/24/1974, above. (Incorporated in Item B-3, above, pp. 279-83 (1983), and in Item C-1990(2), above.)
sunlight has gone, I need it to stay
You could say they are just as bad as Breivik, when in reality they are if they are behind him and protecting the network/group he is from.
I always have a “cotton candy” series of books that I love to keep up with. I confess at one point that book series was the Twilight series, before girls started to become completely obsessed with the books. Now I can’t mention the books without getting murderous glances. It’s not like I want to have Edward Cullen’s babies! They were just a fun read; I wouldn’t even categorize them as literature. Geez. But everyone has to admit, they did for Vampires what Harry Potter did for Witches/Wizards. And they got me into the would of Vampires hook, line and sinker.
Oh...I've had it up to here!
I sure hope my kids find such a passion.
Be sure to release judgement, for yourself and decisions you have made as well as for others. It is enough to work on your stuff, let others be free to work on their own in their own time. Love them and let them be as they choose to be. There may well be life changing decisions and situations happening now. Trust that it is all part of the master plan of what you have been wanting. It is so vitally important to let go and release the past and the old energy. Although it isn’t always fun during those times, the view from the other side is always, always so much better than you can possibly imagine. Keep going, don’t give up and trust. There is great rewards awaiting you. Use your powers, for it is indeed time.
How a group of people, cut off from the real world, vilified and shunned by everyone – even their closest allies – could still continue to show such unwavering support, devotion even, for a leader whose disastrous rule is responsible for bringing such misery and catastrophe upon them?
The favourite so far seems to be the Punch Bunch. This is even better when you know that we will be getting the Owl Punch in the new mini catalogue which will be available on 1 April!
A small lunch box sized cooler. I use this for making yogurt.
This is his favorite saying, my husband's, "it's just another day."
There's nothing quite like a feeling of accomplishment. I felt that when I first mastered the art of dancing with my two-left-wheeled IV pole partner when I was a patient at the City of Hope.
It starts with the her voice. Before you notice the words, before you detect the gently curling melodies tugging them along, this is what hits you first: It’s warm and rich and touched with a soft Southern twang, as likely to swing down into its earthy lower register as arch upwards into a hopeful trill; it’s steady and sure but flecked with a certain weary sadness that stops you dead, draws you near. It’s beautiful. It knows something.
At first glance, I was surprised that Chapman fell to the fifth round, but his knee injury incurred last season was obviously a factor:
Eating can be a challenging piece of it. You don’t want to offend Auntie Besty by declining her famous Pumpkin Cheesecake, but you also know that it will go directly to you hips (or spare tire). If you have the willpower to just have a bite or two (they say after 3 you don’t have the same experience anyway), go ahead and have those few bites. But if you know you can’t resist eating the whole slice (or TWO!), opt to slice a microscopic piece AND make sure to forgo the vanilla ice cream. Better yet, just have a bit or two off your sweetie’s! You shouldn’t completely forgo sweets during this fabulous season, but you also can’t eat every dessert that comes your way. You have to pick and choose what you want. Before you go to the party, decide on your priorities, would you rather have the hor’doreves or are you really in a dessert kind of mood? You really can’t have both. If there are 3 dessert options to choose from which one do you REALLY want or can you get itty bitty tastes of each?
Rep. Joe Barton, R-Texas, said in the same letter he "proudly suppported" the FAA Modernization and Reform Act that allowed for the domestic use of drones. There are many institutions in his home state that the FAA has cleared for done use, including Texas A&M University, the police forces in the city of Arlington outside Dallas-Fort Worth and Montgomery County near Houston.
Jackie: Yeah! He super deserves it, too. I have never played with anyone who needed to buy, fix, and replace more gear than Zack. He’s just such a hard hitter and he must spend $10 every practice on drum sticks alone. So, an endorsement for him was very welcome. I think Max could easily get an endorsement by any guitar company he wanted. Max plays so uniquely and is such a shredder and I can’t imagine anybody not wanting to pick him up. I think its just more an issue of finding the time to court the companies. We would rather practice, honestly. Nobody wants to give away a $10k electric cello. So, I’m screwed in that department.
From that point on, support at meetings in Barking and Dagenham started to dwindle. And not only was attendance at branch meetings falling off, but the number of ward news letters going out was diminishing. As early as late 2008, the overall picture in Barking and Dagenham was that the borough was starting to slip away. And Head Office was becoming ever more remote.
“Men are just women with out the WO- and Males are just females without the Fe..simple really and I can live with that”
“But no one in Britain goes to church,” I exaggerated. Slightly. They looked at me open-mouthed. The British men looked sheepish, and shuffled their feet. And changed the subject. After ten minutes of book chat we started talking about the difficulties of being an expat.
HAPPYKAT: It’s like the Bat Cave only more moist and hopefully less critters…
And the always amazing Boris Karloff is David Mallory, the brains behind the design of the sophisticated alarm system!
Level 4: MP Cost: 32, Duration: 84 seconds, Damage: +8%, Critical Rate: +12%, Minimum Critical Damage: +2%, Attacks up to 1 enemy.
la la la la la
irritability
Copper leaf fringe chain
D Maybe but then again maybe not
Last week, I had to give myself a swift talking to. I’d done so well over recent weeks and had come out from under the duvet where I’d been hiding.I’d stopped swimming because it hurt my jaws to push my chin forward. Or that was my excuse. I couldn’t be bothered. I preferred to sit home and wallow in pain and gloom at my predicament. But a few weeks ago I realised I missed it. Swimming helps the rest of my bones not seize up. It stops me feeling like a lump of lard. And whether it hurts or not, swimming isn’t going to make my jaw problems any worse.
From the heights that I once loved
On Tuesday, I worked my 8-5'er then went back in at 9:30pm for what we call 'Midnight Breakfast' from 10pm to midnight. Here is a snapshot of part of my outfit from that night. Because of course, I changed from my day wear to a comfy casual work night outfit.
Of brokenhearted alabaster truth
It was his smile that made me wonder what the source was of his happiness
and Dora robbed a baby through a dark bebop
You can read Rachel Fox on Grave with Lights, Marion McCready's Vintage Sea and Ross Wilson's The Heavy Bag here: http://slowlaneshuffle.blogspot.com/2011/12/pamphlet-power.html
“Yet, no action has been taken against him. Is it because Azmin had taken him along to Jakarta for a meeting?” he asked.
But there have been some gems lately so I had better get them down before they are lost to my unstable mind forever.
Gerald W. Lynch Theater at John Jay College
It's a bit scary when one of the first things you think, upon reading the above-linked article, is "Thank goodness I got to see the reef before it was completely trashed!!!".
- Small businesses can get a tax credit if they offer health care
Most of all, have a joyous holiday season!
(Okay, odd side note here, but I could not find any Google reference to the characters Julieta and Antonia. Have I found something that is not on the Internet?!?)
So what to do then?
* Click on the twitter and/or facebook icons at the bottom of this post to invite more people to the party. That means more followers for everyone!
Korev - (Cornish Lager)
It must be said that some of the targets of Gough’s satire – property developers, bankers, Young British Artists – have been softened up pretty well already. He shows more teeth when he tackles the Irish literary establishment, though curiously, I felt that this was where his satire seemed less well directed. “Ours is the first generation in three hundred years in which the Novel has made no progress,” we are told. Yet the authors he specifies – Johns McGahern and Banville, Anne Enright, Colm Tóibín – seem among the least culpable for what Gough considers an excessive devotion to lyrical realism in the Irish novel. (Didn’t McGahern pretty much invent that form? Haven’t the others been innovators, now developing their style?) At its weakest, this section of the book devolves into a self-referential ding-dong with John Banville over waspish comments he made about Gough last year. But even while I queried its purpose, the scene of Jude recalling endless Irish novels of people attending funerals in the rain was very funny – and the words of one writer he encounters (“You can tell that we are Good Irish Writers, because the English give us prizes”) have a definite sting to them.
So, if your kids are still little - I KNOW you've heard it a million times before - but guess what??? They won't be little forever. And these very few precious years will soon be gone. If I could go back? I'd worry less about money, less about a clean house, less about looking "perfect", and MORE about playing, and giggling, and enjoying, and exploring, and seeing life for the first time through my Buppy's eyes.﻿
A co-worker reminded me about a group lunch we had scheduled for today. I said, “Sorry, but I’m opting out of that one,” and I looked down at my laptop and pretended to be typing something important while I held my breath. My super power peripheral vision revealed a slightly stunned employee that proceeded to walk away. Yes!!
Yesterday morning, my oh so cute dog, Bailey, decided she was going to eat something she shouldn't be eating. When I tried to get it out of her mouth, she ran away from me and jumped over the couch. I ran around the couch because trying to jump over it would have been a disaster and comical. The door to the large dog crate was open, but I didn't see it because it was dark. So while running I tripped over the crate door, some how cutting my finger and shoulder and scraping my knee. Then I slammed my face into the end table. The disaster was inevitable apparently.
Emergency, that's were serious stuff goes on.
I mumble and say everything wrong.
De Molen - Bring It On!!!
BE SURE TO LEAVE YOUR EMAIL ONCE YOU’VE ENTERED!
A new law went into effect Monday allowing Italian stores to open and close whenever they please. Previously the law required that stores close after a certain number of hours per day, as well as some holidays, Sundays and one day during the work week. Bars and restaurants can also stay open non-stop. Intended to boost consumer spending, the relaxed rules are part of the emergency government's package of stimulus and budget measures that aim to raise 30 billion euros and lift hurl the country out of its debt crisis.
July is dressed up and playing her tune
If we get back at all:
84. Agaat - Marlene van Niekerk
InStyle Stamps is looking for 2 Paper Craft Artists who can think outside the
*Also, my next house will have a wood burning fire place. This all would have been much easier if we could have been warm. (Other option, buy a propane heater.)
2 mushy bananas
Disc Eight (2007): “Memories”
Rise my Bretheren
Some people seem able to find common ground with every single person they come across, and I truly envy that skill. Because so often, with new acquaintances, I find myself running out of anything to talk about very, very quickly. hippie freak that I am, what’s on my radar tends to look pretty different than the things that feature most prominently in many other peoples lives.
I migrate toward it and its frog
$25 prize requirement for each blogger.
of an electric mixer fitted with the paddle attachment, beat the butter with the confectioners’ sugar at medium speed until well blended. Add the egg yolks, mixing until blended and scraping down the sides of the bowl as necessary. While mixing at low speed, add the flour mixture in two additions, mixing until just blended. Turn the dough out onto a work surface and shape into a disk. Wrap the dough in plastic and refrigerate for at least 1 hour.
THE PROBABILITY FOR WIDESPREAD HAZARDOUS WEATHER LOW AT THIS TIME.
P.S. go hug Aunt Rita every chance you can
because it was an inquiry from someone in Georgia.
It looks like I got a bit of a snow tan. My mum used to nag me to have my hair permed in those days, but I never liked it very much. In fact I never liked my hair period. It was always too straight and too thin.
After we left Bunratty Park at closing time, we ventured over to the Woolen Mills, but they were unfortunately closed. We only had about an hour to wait until the Traditional Irish Night banquet so we all hung out in the parking lot. Some people slept. I am not saying any names, but they did. I tried to keep them up, but they couldn't stop themselves! I had my 5 hour energy drink around 2:00 so I wasn't feeling it to badly! We rallied the troops and headed back into the park for the banquet.
Sitting on book prize committees
Faced with the escalating costs of journal subscriptions, which is eating a big hole in university library budgets, some academics are saying that they want to boycott this whole system and publish all future research in open-access journals. Open-access journals put articles online so that everybody can read them. No account, no fees, no passwords. The paywall is gone.
Me (startled): Umm... no.
To tell you the truth again, I believe these are the best songs I've ever written, many of the best players I've ever worked with, and the best singing I've ever gotten on tape. This record is going to be outstanding, and I am fiercely proud of it.
He also, along with his team, not only suggested that a commercial jet could be used as a terrorist weapon, but predicted the most likely targets that would be chosen. Again, he was ignored, and sometimes laughed at.
Use green Tabasco sauce, which is made with jalapenos. It has a kick like red Tabasco, but doesn't taste quite as vinegary.
Etiquette dictates that if the marriage lasts for less than six months, though some will say less than a year, it’s appropriate for the couple to return the gifts they received – cash and products – unless the product has been used.
Stephen would like again to thank everyone for the great support he's receiving. He is recovering well from Round 2 of the chemo and is on track feeling better each day.
I have great beer in the fridge. Tonight felt like a Bob's 47 night, with a crisp bite in the wind outside, me warm inside, watching my Jayhawks dance all over Texas A&M. Boulevard's Bob's 47 is a Munich Style Lager. Very oktoberfest. I poured a bottle of the brew into a glass beer mug, and snapped this picture with my phone. The head pours bubbly, but thin, and quickly dissipates, leaving very light lacing. The color is an orangey-amber, like copper, and very clear, in a filtered sort of way. Sticking my nose into the mug, it smells sweet, a little fruity and slightly spicy. The first sip has a sweet, malty, bready flavor, followed by minor bite, perhaps hops. (The Boulevard site says the beer is brewed with a combination of Pale, Munich, Carapils & Aromatic malts, and Magnum & Hallertau hops.) It is carbonated well to provide some lightness, and the mouthfeel is on the thinner side. This beer presents like it will be too sweet, but the taste left afterwards is a bit dry, only slightly bitter, and drives me to take another sip, and another. Like most of Boulevard's seasonal brews, I wish this one was available for longer periods. Our keg at work is sporting Bob's right now. I have been working overtime lately. :)
While there have been many parties opposed to the merger – including Sprint, the Department of Justice and several states – there are quite a few high profile, well-known names that are supporting it. Yahoo, Research in Motion, Qualcomm, Oracle, Microsoft, Facebook, Brocade and Avaya were named in a letter sent to Julius Genachowski, FCC Chairman. The letter addressed the fact that wireless networks are under pressure to keep up with the increasing demand for wireless broadband, and states that, “Given the network capacity challenges, policymakers must give meaningful consideration to AT&T’s acquisition of T-Mobile as a means of addressing their near term wireless broadband capacity needs,” the letter states.
so it's been over 3 months, eh? i'm not sure what exactly to say about that. this sounds incredibly dramatic, but i've felt like "words escape me" for a while now...i'm not quite able to wax eloquent about much, even you-my sweetest little muse=) i'm talking like i'm a writer, which i most certainly am not. but i don't typically struggle to find words about you, sweet love=)
Written by Patrick Corcoran
Ø Would Have: Past tense that draws attention to things that didn’t actually happen.
When I was a young adult, I attributed this characteristic to being raised in a home where alcohol was an influential factor. Adult children of alcoholics often struggle with enough. I found that I could not entertain without making more than twice enough food. If I carefully planned out the food, I’d rush out at the last minute to buy more, certain that running out of food would be a disaster. When I was a student, I could never figure out when a paper or project was finished. I would keep working and working on it, until I had actually undermined the work I’d done. I learned to procrastinate because then the time constraints would tell me that “this is enough…” because I had to turn it in.
That's the way mama wanted them, as sharp as could be. The more fine the cabbage the better the kraut would be.
The family who own and operate La Tagliata welcomed us with open arms, insisting that we eat a little something to recover from the journey.
I created this blog about 4 years ago and never posted to it; I started posting to a blog on myfitnesspal.com when I began my healthy living journey back in January. But after my friend Cara mentioned that she had been thinking of beginning a blog my interest and passion for writing was sparked again. (Thanks Cara, es)
I stumbled into my first head injury when I was three years old; escalators and I have never been friends since. It probably wasn’t the smartest idea after that for me to take gymnastics class, but that was where I fell into my second head injury. I was ten.
I usually don't use alot of embellishments much less make them but I was inspired. I wanted to use burlap and mesh to create something that resembeled a bird's nest. I painted the bird and added some glitter.
“I did not know she was going to do that! And then, after it happened, I was so shocked and embarrassed… I didn’t know what to do and I handled the situation badly. I’m sorry, really!” he persisted.
File size: 95Mb
scratch and claw until I completely wreck
The varnished holly's glistening,
Peter and I scouted up the necessary garb including "work boots," and Peter fashioned a tool belt using his own father's WW II ammo belt.
This is a good example of how life SHOULD work. It never does because everyone is dumb and doesn't listen when I, uh, people say how smart they are and how they should be the boss.
And Cat would not obey them. And when Adam and Eve gazed into Cat’s eyes, they were reminded that they were not the supreme beings.
For example, who could resist stopping at the Enaville Resort and Snake Pit? Or Soap Lake? Or Flaming Geyser State Park? Or the Railroad Interpretive Center? Half the fun is trying to guess where these names come from. “Moses Lake. Does it occasionally part itself?” Turns out Moses Lake is parted by the Interstate, which cruises through the center of the lake on a strip of land as thin as the proverbial prophet’s miraculous staff. Then there was the Molly B’Damned Motel. The name raises the obvious question: who was Molly? An ex-wife? An unsupportive mother-in-law? An unhelpful real estate agent? A nay-saying neighbor? Whoever she was, somebody sure showed her.
(2) Interpret the Constitution the way God wanted.
Some may know extraneous details, but just she and I know what happened. I think at this point, actually, I’m the only one that knows.
1/4 cup chopped sundried tomatoes
Later on, we’ll conspire
I dare you to rub my cards! hehe
even the mere idea of her trying to listen for my baby's heartbeat is incredibly stressful.
not wanting anyone to perish,
Or I could have called this post 'What to do when your gorgeous model is at preschool?'. Thanks to George for stepping in today, he was very co-operative and stood still for me. So at last, here are more of my crocheted hat patterns for you. These will actually be named Operation Christmas Child hats so that people can make up the hats and pop them in boxes as part of Operation Christmas Child. I'll share the link to my hats once its up there!
05 - Stone In Your Heart 04:16
Bloch, Erich. “Cooperation, Competition, and Science Policy.” Science 273.5283 (1996): 1779. Academic OneFile. Web. 31 Mar. 2012.
If left with a lot of time ad better knowledge of Flash I would enjoy making a more animated website with more flash features and designs but for a photography website I have found that the more simple the better, as the photos are the key aspects and what the website should be used for to advertise your photographic work reflecting only slightly your own personal taste.
And yet, we did not see the left rising to the occasion in opposing that with the force appropriate to such a fierce reactionary assault. The left even stated often that it "understood" this demand for "security", and voted with no qualms in favor of flagrantly persecutorial decisions, as those aimed at expelling from the public space this or that woman under the pretext that she covered her hair or wrapped her body.
Have a beautiful spring day!
I was told it was about 95% effective.
THE LINK:
A couple of days ago I got off early and decided to finally show the kids where I work. Yes, that mysterious place where they drop me off some mornings, and cannot go further because they lack a government security clearence and I don’t. I strapped them in their car seats, grabbed my SUPER AWESOME camera, and headed in. For the record, the kids can go into the Johnson Space Center with no badge if they are under 17 and if their parent has one.
Right now at EcoHouse, we haven’t got a great place to store all of our bicycles! A few of us get a bit of extra exercise by climbing the steps from the driveway to the deck and leave our bikes up there. Some of us have had enough exercise already and just leave our bikes by the community garden. The brave among us put our bikes in the garage for extra safe keeping!
I keep coming back!
Jake spoke gently yet passionately relating his narrative. We laughed, and we cried. I shared my story too, being a single mom to a teenaged daughter and the understandings many assume they share of me.
One last thing I want to touch on too is that cancer thrives in an acidic environment. There are test strips you can buy to check your pH level. All body fluids except for stomach and urine are meant to be slightly alkaline. As levels become acidic oxygen is driven out of the cells. Blood must always remain at an alkaline pH 7.4 so that it can retain oxygen. When adequate mineral consumption is in the diet, the blood is supplied the crucial minerals required maintain an alkaline pH of 7.4. However, today most people’s diet is not optimal. With that being said the body will rob other body fluids to keep the blood alkaline. It removes crucial minerals from organs and fluids in the body and this causes the de-mineralized fluids and organs to become acidic and therefore anaerobic, thus including not only cancer, but a host of other degenerative diseases.
reading Karen's blog and she had a picture of her hand knitted socks. Well, before the day was over, my friend Ann and I had driven out to this wonderful little knit shop outside of town and purchased some new yarn. It's like just the picture puts this suggestion into my head and I HAVE to knit socks! I know it's about keeping my hands busy when I'm not hooking or doing other things. I can't just sit and visit or watch TV without doing something. I do really like this color pattern.
The BBC Top Gear presenter claimed that the long delays at Heathrow border control were because immigration officials were no longer allowed to use their discretion to wave certain passengers through.
Sunglasses: H&M
Another reason I wanted to start this site up is that I’m bored. I have copious amount of time to burn. Since I work nights I try to stay on the same schedule when I’m off. I’m off about 3-4 nights a week so I have plenty of time to myself. I love saying that too. Normally people are so busy within the day they have barely enough time to sleep. I say I have plenty of time to burn but in reality I could be doing other things. The problem is that the neighbors probably wouldn’t like me mowing or working on my house at 3am in the morning. Another problem is that there isn’t much to do at these late hours. Nothing is open and the people I know that up at this hour I work with.
Today, I will mostly be brainstorming dates and venues.
at day’s end
We crossed the Chenango River, but it wasn't particularly scenic. I'm trying to show you better photos. The afternoon walking was almost all along Bear Brook which was so gorgeous we took pictures every time we turned around. Larry's new Aussie hat makes him look very handsome, too.
For better or worse, I'm not a big "date" person. I don't really have strong emotional ties to certain dates other than birthdays and anniversaries of immediate family members, and even have a hard time remembering those sometimes! I think of people who have passed (my friend Doug, my Grandpa Earl, my Grandma Evelyn) all the time, and I remember the time of year that they passed, but not the dates. So when I think of things I'll remember about this year, they're not really tied to specific dates. That said:
** A spice blend that usually contains ground fennel seeds, Szechuan peppercorns, cinnamon, star anise, and cloves; available in the spice section of most supermarkets and online at penzeys.com.
Marc bought it at the Oxfam book shop in Marylebone 1994 for the princely sum of £3.25, which is still scribbled on the title page in pencil. That was a significant investment in those days post-university, when a fine lad didn’t have a dime to spare, mainly because the few he was earning needed to go straight to buying cigarettes and rounds at the pub.
If $2600 was required for every smart-phone, not providing them to employees would make sense… but for only $138 committed cost anyone can have a phone that will work for photo documentation.
Lewis was referring to the recently-announced deal that will preserve that Brooklyn complex in the face of fears rent protections would be removed by a new owner. The irony in the case of AY is that “City Hall,” in the form of the political establishment, backs Atlantic Yards.
To be very clear, I hate the part of me that fucked up, I want to kill it, smash it to pieces because life is all about opportunities and each and everyone has got to be taken, even if it, as is often the case, is all there is. The myth of things leading to other things is a destructive one, I believe in opportunity for opportunity's sake, each on it's own merits.
We had about 10" of snow fall last Saturday and by Tuesday it was all melted. The heavy, wet snow brought down many trees and it sounded like bombs going off outside. Pretty scary stuff!
So I responded with an explanation I knew she would never understand, one that would give her no happiness and would answer no questions. But it was one that I knew she would not be able to argue:
“No… That really isn’t necessary.” Derrek insisted vehemently. “But you really think I’m suspicious? I mean I don’t really think that… Well…”
We’ve still said nothing at all.
8 Skor or Heath bars, broken into pieces
— Be sensitive when seeking or using interviews or photographs of those affected by tragedy or grief.
06-13 Brussels, Belgium – Ancienne Beliguque
-Taco topping
An ex MOE PRC scholar Liu Yuchen, who is currently studying in the United States, has voiced out against the behavior of his fellow countryman Sun Xu who sparked nationwide outrage with his now infamous remark on there ‘being more dogs than humans’ in Singapore.
The thing is, you have time to stabilise in hospital. Your sole activity is getting better. And hospital life, well it’s boring, being on a psych ward. It’s not how it is in the movies. Believe me. There’s no Jack Nicholson characters, or at least not while I was there. Pretty soon you’re climbing the walls and you just want to go the fuck home.
At that time, I was still trying to put the last few finishing touches to Alan Moore: Storyteller for Ilex Press and attending to several other urgent freelance jobs, and the extremely short two-week deadline made it unlikely that I’d find the time to be able to contribute. I racked my brains for some sort of positive, uplifting angle (as had been stipulated by the organisers, the ) and had pretty much given up on coming up with something worthwhile when I was inspired by a two-minute film in Channel 4’s nightly series 4Thought while stir-frying some chicken and vegetables for that night’s dinner.
For years, I tried to answer emails as they came in. The ding in the in-box was like the proverbial snap of the finger—read me now! Give me your attention! This certainly did not allow me to focus on what I was working on. Then I realized that people began expecting immediate answers, day and night.
Meditate on the words, and the number of the passage, and answers will come to you.
I recently read a post by the lovely Anna about how she has taken up knitting for pleasure and how it is no longer a necessity these days. It got me thinking about how we’ve lost so many of our practical domestic skills. Very few people seem to knit, sew or do any kind of woodwork. Instead we just go out and buy everything as things are so cheap.
10:30 AM
Doll Characters
Rostra Info:
*Societal/Civic fulfillment and recognition
This film boasts ‘the scariest moment in film,’ which many modern viewers may disagree with but is still rather creepy, especially if you don’t like ventriloquist dummies. Its also the picture that began the portmanteu, or several stories linked by one, format employed by Amicus films.
There's something therapeutic about walking after the sun goes down. In the dark, with the stars dotted in a velvety sky, it's peaceful.
Mr. Bailey, who grew up on Tumbledown Dick Road in Oxfordshire, and Mr. Hurst got the idea for the books when they read about a couple who bought a house on Butt Hole Road, in South Yorkshire.
and find my inner being
In the course of my chaplain work I stopped by to visit a man who’s undergoing some severe testings in life. In respect to his privacy I won’t disclose the details, but the burdens he bears are common to all, but his is rather intense at the present time. He’s normally cheerful but during this visit he was weighed down by anxiety. I had little specific counsel to offer him as I carefully listened. In the end I shared a kind word with the goal of lifting his spirit. He’s been on my heart and in my prayers since then.
1 pound smoked sausage of your choice, sliced
We who fight against internationalism, do so because we love our people, and indeed we see the value of all people. We respect the rights of everyone to live amongst his and her own kind, immersed in the indigenous culture, as part of an unbroken chain linking our ancestors to those yet to come. Internationalism is the great threat which seeks to destroy all humanity. We may not agree with the Jewish worldview, but we respect the right of the Jews to live together unmolested by non-Jews - indeed we support the right of all Jews to relocate to the Jewish State (Birobidjan, not Palestine) and live at peace with their neighbours. Breivik has tarred the name of the anti-internationalists by associating our struggle with terrorism. This, of course, is the reason for the atrocities commited in Oslo, which Breivik has claimed responsibility for, but were more than likely the work of the MOSSAD.
The closest it gets is Obama 274, McCain 264, but that really seems unlikely. That would mean McCain picks off every realistic swing state, plus holds on to Virginia. Likewise, it is conceivable but improbable that Obama gets as many as 394 electoral votes. I predict Obama 349, McCain 189, which is enough of a spanking to force the GOP to re-examine itself and start becoming relevant again.
Here is my 2011/2012 Barclays Premier League Team of the Season. I have gone for a 4-2-1-3 formation. Manchester City dominated with five players while Tottenham can boast of two players. Arsenal, Everton, Newcastle and Manchester United also have one representative each.
Bathing them in light and loving energy
Take a closer look.
I also started one other quilt. This may be a wedding quilt for Steve and Lindsey. I have another one planned, but not sure I can get it done in time...so here's how far I got on Labyrinth. I had been doing so much easy sewing for a while that it took a bit of an adjustment to put this crazy thing together. I had to slow wayyyyy down for this one. Only 2 more rounds and at least the center will be together.
“Hey! Sniff, sniff! You smell like you’ve spilled some food on yourselves! Cool!” I imagined him thinking as he proceeded to lick the remnants of lunch from their clothes and hands and mouths.
One of the main functions and benefits of drinking aloe vera juice is that it helps to improve the immune system of the body. This it does by releasing high doses of antioxidants in the body that get rid of the free radicals (which lead to aging and release of other harmful toxins) and help in improving the immunity of the body.
It was such a good day.
I realized this morning that I still felt very much like a cork–powerless over this storm. My soon to be ex-husband communicates with me as little as possible. I know that he has graduated university, I know he will need to find a place to live outside of the dorms, and a job to support himself. These decisions will affect my children, and, indirectly, me. A job will hopefully mean the beginning of child support, something I have struggled without. Will he propose to his new girlfriend once the divorce is final? Will she become part of my children’s life? How much longer until the paperwork for the bankruptcy and divorce are complete? When can I close this door and start the journey forward? All I get is silence.
The Sleep time:
What he can't give me is all of your very detailed and thoughtful feedback. You look at EVERY aspect of the piece and then give suggestions. I really do love your way of teaching ; ) and I am going to add those touches you've suggested. Wonderful suggestions, each one of them made me think, huh, I should have thought about that! Thank you for doing the heavy thinking for us ; ) And thank you for your compliments, that should keep me on another cloud for a couple of days at least!!
First of all I would just like to say that the end results do not 100% look like real butcher block. The only way you are going to get counters that look like real butcher block is to get the real thing or make a trip to Ikea. Has a really go tutorial on how she did hers using Ikea counter tops.
“I just lay down.”
First of all, when the eggs are laid, they are covered with a thin film of oil that acts as a barrier protecting them from bacteria and water loss (the water content of an egg is high, if the water evaporates from inside, you’re going to have a bad egg.) If you don’t wash the egg, it can sit on your counter for a few days un-refridgerated and still be good. Think about it, in colonial times, they didn’t have refrigerators, most often the eggs sat in the kitchen until they were ready to be used.
***AND YOU THOUGHT THAT DREAM I HAD LAST WEEK WAS WEIRD! Well, here's an even weirder one that I can't make any real heads or tails outta. The whole night was filled with strange occurances in dreamland, but the part where I came home after a hard day at the nerve gas factory and found out that none other than well-published pipsqueak CHUCK EDDY was there to visit me was something that was really taking the cake! I naturally was irritated that this mental munchkin had invaded the sanctity of my abode especially after being run through the wringer, so while my parents "entertained" Mr. Eddy as if he were some visiting royal dignitary (y'know, like ask him what he does for a living and how many kids he has) I spent my time hiding in my bedroom and the bathroom where I did things like pluck a big long hair on my scalp resembled a black leek. After awhile who should bust into my vary toilet area but Mr. Eddy himself, looking a lot like the schlong I've seen in pictures o'er the years only smaller as if he were a mere ten-year-old loudmouth deserving of a big walloping!
Avery Brewing Company Voltron
Celebrity favorites Sarah Potempo and smashbox will also lend their expertise by creating all of the models’ looks for The Buzz on the Red Carpet – Live from L.A. show.
Michael Ian Black: “The point of jigsaw puzzles seems to be to spend hours and hours assembling an image you can already see on the box.”
Just this morning over her sippy cup of milk and my mug of coffee, which we always drink in a big chair looking out at our bird feeder and the nest box, we saw a chickadee going into the box. I'm not sure she could see it so I told her a chickadee went in her nest box. An hour later we went outside to play and she ran over and said "Chick-chee bird nest?" "I sure hope so, and you can take care of it" I told her, and she laughed. Having one's own little nature pupil is the best thing in the world.
M.S: I did a great deal of research over the decade I spent writing the book. I visited the historical milling district of Minneapolis and walked up and down Summit Avenue in St. Paul. I visited antique stores to physically hold the sort of objects my characters would have had in their homes. I interviewed my husband's Flemish grandmother about her experience of the First World War. For a while, I collected WWI era postcards.
I should mention that the Bluefire Reader allows you to read DRM-protected Adobe Digital documents. This is necessary for reading galley proofs from publishers from services like NetGalley. If you have an Adobe ID, you can authorize Bluefire to read your secure books.
On my blog, I will be doing something new. Every week, I will make a quiz. On the comments, answer the questions. The person that gets the most questions right gets put on the score board (I will explain that later). At the end of the month, the person with the most amount of pointswins and gets a special post about them and their blog (if they have one). The scoreboard: If someone gets the most amount of questions right, their name will be put on the score board. For instance: (at te end of the month, it might look like this)
What would you describe as local?
"I noticed you were weaving back there. Had anything to drink today?"
So I took her idea and sent a valentine to each granddaughter. I wrote to each of them….”I love you because….” and listed about 4 or 5 things about them that I love. I specifically referred to their personalities.
3/4 cup shredded, sweetened coconut
Never mind the stupid morality arguments and the dubious health ‘risks’ that don’t even begin to be as ‘risky’ as smoking tobacco or drinking alcohol, or eating too much salt or sugar…
P.S. There's a new poll on the sidebar, open for a bit over a week only, so vote now!
5. DIAMONDS AND BONES by Kris Austen Radcliffe
‘ How do you feel about the right my children have to choose what and when to learn? Do you think it should be removed?’
I have to admit, I get a kick out of the beer names too. The beer pictured above is an IPA called "Hopasaurus Rex," one of the many favorites at Titletown Brewing Company in Green Bay.
Guilt and Fear? No thanks.
And so, to work. I find myself in an interesting situation. Parts of me have forgotten so much, yet somewhere, deeper, there's a me who knows the answers. So I am, at the same time, pupil and teacher. I've not got a clear idea of what I want to make yet, so I'm making a few things as exercises. I need to set up some kind of throwing gauge and practise making same size/same shape pieces. I need to stretch myself a bit.
Then there were the Mauerpark Fleamarket, where I’m sure you could buy anything you wanted. Missing a belt? Buy one made out of re-purposed tyres. Don’t have a camera? Get a 1950s vintage camera here. Getting married? No problem. Get your sequined 80s wedding gown here, as long as you don’t mind the rather obvious yellow paint splatter stain on the front (seriously…who would ever buy this?). Equally gorgeous bridesmaid dresses also available. Anything, everything, is here.
The normal vegetarian char siew that you often seen being sold at shops are made from flour. I tried to experiment making Char Siew from tau kan (wet beancurd blocks) and the result turns out great. I managed to make the aroma and texture of the taukan same are the flour vegan char siew. You can buy tau kan from any vegetarian food vendor.
I LIVE in East London, trust me the caterpillars are the least of your worries.
Serves 2
man. Of course clowns are funny. I mean,
Anyway...here's my layout!! Another older photo of my Lilah, at about 3 months old. She looks so sweet...looks to me like she's thinking "I'm adorable and I know it!!"
Edit 5: Another picture of a few kids playing with one of their favorite toys. Reddit, twice now, you have nearly brought me to tears. I have never felt so encouraged in my life. Donations are coming in too fast to keep track, so I will update as soon as they seem to slow down. If the donations reach over $2,000, the rest will go towards food and supplies for the children. I will ABSOLUTELY keep all of you updated with the progress.
She takes the same bus
Stickers
Things didn’t turn out quite as I planned. Rubbed in smoked black pepper and braised in apple cider, the flavor was good. But the meat was a bit tough, and the skin never got crispy enough. I knew I could do better.
I think we stood on the porch for a while just taking in the moment together. We admired my sparkly new ring, said "I love you," and just held each other. We finally walked inside and told my parents and my siblings the news, then headed up to Daniel's to share it with his family, too.
Who had it? The Canaanites.
Summer is here, and the prospect of barbecues, holidays and relaxation stretches before us. Summer isn't just a season, it is a state of mind. One of the ways we enjoy summer is in the more casual way that we dress. Seersucker, linen, bright and light colours, all look and feel great and help us enjoy the season. What would July and August dressing, or for that matter resort dressing, be without Lilly Pulitzer? Lilly is the Florida designer known for her unmistakable, brightly coloured prints, who this year celebrates the 50 year anniversary of her first designs.
As human beings we are uniquely endowed with a very powerful ability…FREE-WILL… which is our inherent capacity to think and chose freely above and beyond external influence or force. Simply stated, we can voluntarily chose or decide what or how to think about ourselves, others, things and experiences. It is our innate free-will which upholds the universal claim that we are ultimately responsible for what we experience.
Yesterday was only one day of the journey towards finding what Sophia wants and needs to fulfill her life learning journey. It gave us an idea of what choices are out there and also provided us with a lot of ideas we hadn't thought of before that we can start working on this year as she continues to live life at home. Overall, a great experience, but the search continues.
Cast : Chevy Chase, Dan Aykroyd, John Candy, Demi Moore, Valri Bromfield, Taylor Negron, Bertila Damas, Raymond J. Barry, Brian Doyle-Murray, John Wesley, Peter Aykroyd, Daniel Baldwin, James Staszkiel, Deborah Lee Johnson, Karla Tamburrelli
comen he is of kind
bug, a nearby supernova explosion, a nuclear accident, ice age inception, the creation of a mini black hole in the Large Hadron Collider that gobbles up Earth. And the list goes on and on and on. In the movie “2012”, neutrinos from the sun heat up the Earth’s core causing the tectonic plates to shift.
The Gable room is one of two guest rooms here at StoneGable. The larger Guest Suite, with it's own bath and back stairs, is home to our adorable niece Courtney right now. Her just-out-of-college job brought her here to our town and she is staying with us.
First off, thanks so much for your encouraging words! You are the best!! I wasn't sure about posting my photos - but I am glad I did! You gave me the courage to continue on my quest to staying healthy!! xoxo
I was not very happy when Facebook bought Instagram because I wanted Twitter to have made the acquisition. Personally I just feel Twitter would do better a job with Instagram and keep it simple and integrate it into the social network. Facebook does not plan to make any changes to Instagram and make it similar to it’s social network. Facebook has said it wants Instagram remain how it is and not be effected in anyway.
Although I admit now it was inappropriate, I chuckled when I realized Diesel and Fritz didn’t know I’d been on a few coyote hunts of my own. I’d seen how smart a coyote could be. I knew I could make it to town.
Edited to add:
Here’s a description of “Eating Out 2″ from IMDB: “After Marc dumps him, Kyle unites with Gwen and Tiffani to land sexually confused art model Troy by pretending to be straight. However, Marc wants Troy, too, and members from a notorious ‘ex-gay’ group are slipping for the both of them.”
"No," I said. "I'm kind of known as the Converse Girl."
come, and give you vibrations while your coming,
Have a wonder-full day, y'all!
Madzivanyika ChiHuri Mashayamombe Samukange CHINGOMA VIII Mafusire Mazuru Gwindi Chikaka
made of three large holes in the ground surrounded by
By the end of the month I knew I was going to see some good numbers on the scale. After thirty days of a healthy diet and two weeks of cardio on an elliptical machine for 30 minutes a day, I had lost 27 pounds.
Worchestershire sauce, 1 teaspoon
I am thinking differently about myself. I accept without being big-headed about it that people admire me. They respect me. I inspire others. People are not deluded if they think I’m capable. If they think I’m worthy, it isn’t because they just don’t know me well enough. I am releasing negative self-talk. I am my first and best lover of my soul.
1 whole wheat tortilla
What???? Well, here goes:
14. How often do you go out to eat? Where do you go?
The ‘Unlimited Monthly’ service costs only $45. For this very low monthly rate you can make phone calls, text as much as you like, send picture messages and serve the web.
If you head out there, check their website for the train schedule.
“There’s a surprise,” she said theatrically. “There is one thing, though.”
My life revolves around the weather, a fetish I developed after moving to the UK, and so here is the update. Its officially Autumn in our neck of woods and I must say its not as depressing as I thought it would be. In fact I'm secretly enjoying the gloomy weather and continuous rains to an extent. The only down side is the fact that photography has taken a back seat as it starts getting dark early and since I start cooking only by around 5, I've missed out on what little sunlight is pouring through.
(By the way, this post is not actually about books, so if that’s what you are looking for you will not find it here. Keep looking.)
You don't take a paci or have a blankie, you don't really have any "favorite" toys, but you really enjoy chewing on Joshua's Nerf bullets. I think those are probably your favorite thing in the house. Either that or you just accept them as a teething toy because they're so readily available?
Germany tells Russia to stop looking at Austria, or Germany will render Russia incapable of such action.
7) Phoning an elderly friend to share and pray
The indictment returned by a grand jury in Virginia charged Kiriakou with one count of violating the Intelligence Identities Protection Act and three counts of violating the Espionage Act.
Some of you may be thinking "Wall of Frames???? What ever does she mean?" As none of you know, I have a massive amount of wall space that you can see up my stairs leading to my second floor. The railing on the stairs are industrial with steel railing that you can see through (you'll understand what I mean when you see the finished product picture in this post)... That being said, I needed an idea that would cover A LOT of wall space.
It was great seeing them all again and although my nieces were a handful, they brightened my week.
We have had lizards hiding in the garage. Which is not so bad, until one day you discover that the garage door has squished one. And your husband is out of town. And you get to clean up the nastiness yourself.
Alan Jones, finance director of Arrowcroft, said this was because the company was unsure whether any purchase of the land would contain an overage provision.
After our meetings finished, I managed to fit in a visit to the popular Russian Market, initially to pick up some Cambodia silk which a friend had asked me to bring back. I found myself drawn in to the glorious colours and somehow left the shop with silk sets for my close in laws too. As I carted the heavy bags out of the market, I was wondering how many kilos I had purchased and whether it would be less than the 3 kilos which I think I had “spare” on the way over. Then it suddenly dawned on me that I subconsciously broken through this block and managed to project myself into the “after the checks” unknown. I will probably have excess baggage but at least I have been able to look ahead. Now I just need to book that ticket!
So I propose this: call out slut shaming wherever you see it. Don’t be angry or riled up. Just note the double standard. Ask the person why they think a double standard is fair. Ask if they’d like to be treated like that.
A few of the reviews of “The Cut” were less than flattering, noting the plot wrapped up too quickly (it did), that Spero wasn’t thoroughly developed (he wasn’t), and that the book was too short (so what?). Mostly I would attribute this to the fact that this book was like the pilot for a new TV show. It gave you just enough to keep coming back for the next episode. We discovered just enough about Spero to know that we like him and to know that there is more to learn about him.
Invisible Man - The Bell Tune (Good Looking Records)
Of course dealing with the government policies is solar PV biggest obstacle to overcome. According to a article by Barbara Harriss-White, Sunali Rohra, and Nigel Singh, ”In India, energy was nationalised before and during the Emergency in the 1970s. It is a state responsibility under the more or less formal direction of the central government. Like agriculture, energy is a “policy theme” scattered throughout many state bodies, and organised differently in different states. Each state also has a range of public corporations and development agencies concerned with energy and/or with renewable energy, though state electricity boards have no interests in off-grid technology. As in agriculture, direct participation is inextricably entangled with those of parametric regulation. The political architecture of solar energy has formidable coordination costs.” Some of the major actors in this advocacy campaign are, Clinton Global Initiative and The Energy and Resources Institute’s (TERI) campaign with Tata BP. These groups work tirelessly to use information politics and leverage politics to help promote the purchase of and use of solar technology in India. TERI specifically used information politics in order to enlighten India on the growing problem of climate change and its environmental affects, “TERI is paradigmatic, headed by the Nobel Laureate, Rajendra Pachauri. TERI evolved from being a Tata-funded institute to a multi-sourced one. Working with 800 staff on ‘every aspect of sustainable development’, it produced some 218 publications in 2007-08 of which four were explicitly on solar energy.”
Geotagging is the process of adding geographical identification to photographs, video, websites and SMS messages. It is the equivalent of adding a 10-digit grid coordinate to everything you post on the internet. Geotags are automatically embedded in pictures taken with smartphones. Photos posted to photo sharing sites like Flickr and Picasa can also be tagged with location. Intelligence and security force personnel are well trained how to bypass these functions, and how to protect their own identies and their exact locations. The average sheeple-masses are not informed how to do this!
Step 3: Every day, Highlight the next point and modify your orders on each currency pair.
Those lampposts caused an awful fuss – and no wonder. In the end (as the notes with the picture do not mention) the residents contributed the money themselves to have the them removed and replaced with what I suppose could be called fake gas lights of pleasanter appearance and much more modest dimensions.
Awareness of transgender children is growing. But their stories rarely cross into the mainstream because families don’t want their children to be identified. Even adult transsexuals risk ridicule (and sometimes physical abuse) when talking about their past. The Oprah Winfrey Show first featured an 11-year-old girl who wanted surgery to become a boy in 2004. Not to long ago a very cute six-year-old girl, Jazz, appeared on the Barbara Walters show in the US. She had been born as a boy but she identified so strongly as a girl that her parents decided to let her be who she wanted to be. She and her parents appeared on television under assumed names. “We’ll say things like, ‘You’re special. God made you special.’ Because there aren’t very many little girls out there that have a penis,” said her mother Renee. They were comfortable with identifying their child as transgender.
Think about it: Eliot first meets ET in a shed-like garage, finds he's being hunted by scientists who want to "dissect him or something"; ET is "seen" only by children, at first. In one scenes he heals Eliot's cut finger by touching it. He tells Eliot's sister to "be good". He and Eliot become so empathically linked that when E.T. starts to die, Eliot sickens, too and so E.T. cuts the link to Eliot – essentially his life support – and allows himself to die, thereby saving Eliot. But when E.T.'s "family" come back from space his heart begins to glow again and he comes alive again. (Think of those pictures or statues where Jesus is shown with a glowing red heart!). Before E.T. leaves, he touches Eliot's forehead with his finger and says, "I'll be here". Then he ascends into the heavens, leaving a rainbow-like star above.
Some people may wonder if I'm not wasting my life. Most days I would concede that some people might have a point...
I IMed Mr. W at work to tell him and he replied, "It's time to move." Then, still shaky and filled with fear, I texted a friend who lives nearby, IMed another one and called my mom. I have a tendency to try to suck other people into my stressful situations so I don't have to experience them alone.
She is ordering things that are new to her, instead of asking for the same thing she always has.
Deleuze, Gilles and Felix Guattari. A Thousand Plateaus: Capitalism and Schizophrenia. University of Minnesota Press. 1987
The first reason I haven't written about it is because, well, I'm lazy, and I've been doing a lot of reading and there have been some pretty hairy and emotionally debilitating things going on in my life since November.
Life Without the 550D…
I'm not sure how many of you are aware of this, but two weeks ago my family and I moved to Portland Oregon from Tahiti, French Polynesia. I've been living away from the US for 17 years, my husband Josh has been away for 18 years and my kids have never lived in the US.
With baby boomers retiring and having time for an extended vacation, Vietnam offers both variety and value. A little investigation, determination, and adventurous spirit will land you in a beautiful country where your dollar goes a long way.
4. There is a massive rush to be the first with the news. And this leads to cut corners, shoddy journalism and the spreading of lies by people who genuinely believe that they have been presented with the facts. Not a week goes by when some sleb doesn't have to deny they are dead, because Twitter is convinced of it. Journalists prepare in advance much more and even make up lies so that their article on whether or not someone is guilty or innocent can be out in the big wide world first. In the past they would have had the time to fact check. And at least try and pretend that they are more interested in the truth than clicks on their website. Talking of which...
Image-building
2. Gene’s Rock Star Moment - fellow delegation member, Gene, is a bit of a novelty in Turkey. Here at Topkapi Palace, he was rushed by a gaggle of school boys who thought he was a rock star and/or basketball star. We did nothing to dispel the myth (language barrier and all).
“Setting the Scene
5. What is the last meal that you prepared for yourself? Tonight I made a salad with prawns and mache and side of brown rice.
we loved florida. But one thing I cannot wrap my mind around is the fact they do not get to experience seasons the way that we do. The colors changing, the falling leaves, the chill air, drinking pumpkin spice lattes in hoodies. Oh, and Huber's orchard.
Luckily, a short time later, her best friend dropped by, and they discovered that the best friend was looking for an opportunity to partner with someone who would make items to sell online. The jewelry designer/goldsmith/bead addict was overjoyed! So the jewelry designer/goldsmith/bead addict was able to resume doing what she loved best and her best friend was able to start doing what she wanted to do, and Bead On a Wire was reborn!
Grudgingly, Thackery moved over to the table and sat down. As he started to eat, Paran joined him, pouring them each a goblet of wine.
1/4 cup butter or margarine
But, one of my biggest regrets in sport was being only ten years old on May 1st, 1994. The day Ayrton Senna fatally lost control of his Williams and crashed in the Imola GP. At 34 years old he still had the world at his feet and the F1 world was looking forward to at least three seasons of a new rivalry between Senna and the upcoming Shumacher. But it wasn’t to be. He still is the youngest triple world champion ever, he holds the record for most career pole positions as well as most consecutive pole positions. He truly was a great driver.
Today, 11-year-old Chef Jack is happy and optimistic that his treatments will keep him healthy. The sales of this cookbook benefit pediatric leukemia research.
I am still very behind on catching up to all the questions! But today I have to address a serious question with no time to spare in answering.
So, let's do it. Let's make addicts patients, and dealers irrelevant and priced out of the market, so that criminality isn't the obvious option out of the hole people are in. Welsh Lib Dem policy is already to decriminalise drugs, for exactly these reasons. I probably won't be at federal conference this year because I can't afford it, but I think Ewan Hoyle is a brilliant man, and I am pretty psyched about his motion calling for a government backed inquiry. He's a lot more measured and succinct in his discussion than I am to boot: today he's said "It is important not only to examine the opportunities we haven't given youth, but also the hugely lucrative criminal opportunities we have. Removing the drug trade from criminal gangs would force many young people to seek legitimate employment elsewhere and be less likely to see criminal behaviour as acceptable or attractive. The culture of criminality likely stems from this massive market we have handed to criminal gangs that recruit footsoldiers, dealers and runners from the ranks of kids who should be studying, training, or practising skills."
Somebody special turned three on Saturday.You'll have to excuse my tardiness for I'm still in disbelief that she is three years old! I honestly don't know how they have made time fly even faster, but they have!
Behavioural design patterns
The book will be available next week! I’ll post all the details once it is ready for ordering!
On the days off we visited Bunker Hill, Faneuil Hall, Downtown Boston, and Salem among other places. The work days were almost always pretty easy and the days off were like being on a vacation where most of our expenses were paid.
Not surprisingly the Shaka Shaka is a shaker mechanism pencil. The instructions for its use were a little beyond me, but you can operate it as an ordinary push top ratchet mechanism, with ten clicks getting you 7mm of 0.5mm lead, or you can shake away and operate it with the shaker mechanism. The push top button can also be fully depressed to lock the shaker mechanism so it doesn’t operate. This doesn’t just lock the shaker, it also makes the pencil non-operational as the lead is no longer held by the chuck and thus can be pushed back up inside the sleeve. Some might say that the lock is not 100% effective, as if you give it a really good shaking you will get a little bit of lead advancement. However the lead is not gripped and it can just be pushed straight back in.
I immediately heard this song in my head.
Brains turning like the hamster
So instead you can enjoy the only picture Connor has ever taken with the Easter bunny. He was a week old and also asleep so he couldn't protest, and also this one at least didn't have the full face mask on. That's the only reason he isn't yelling his little head off.
fair, none but Autumn with
PiHi
As you would expect, we had none of this and, as you’d expect, about fifteen minutes later there an encore. They came back out to play Ruby, which didn’t actually make the version of Torches that I got a hold of, before banging out Pumped up Kicks in a super awesome 7 minute ordeal that, after the full song was played, jumped into a club style dubstep remix – it’s truly difficult to articulate how fantastic this really was, so I’ll leave you here with a verdict and a video.
So whilst strolling the hallowed halls of Sephora, I picked up a travel sized version of Urban Decay‘s “All Nighter” Spray, a product that guarantees to keep the makeup on your face in humid Louisiana summers and the nightclubs of London alike. Urban Decay worked with SKINDINAVIA, a company that specializes in makeup setting sprays. Claimed to keep your foundation on for 16+ hours, the product contains a “patented temperature control technology” that keeps skin cool during the hottest of summer days, but also moist enough when it’s cold out (ie: on the slopes – I could have used this product in Switzerland!) While I was trying this product specifically for my foundation, it also keeps eyeshadows, highlighters and blushes in place.
My uncle started abusing me when I was two. The abuse escalated from that point on. What I think started out as baths, turned into something so horrible it made my mind shatter. I still can’t remember much from the abuse other than the memories that have surfaced. I couldn’t give a description of my childhood years other than small glimpses from the early abuse, and longer memories from the later years. I remember small glimpses of being raped orally when I was three. These memories are filled with smells and sensations rather than words. They are images. Image of blood and water.
Does the name sound elegant? The Tiffany deﬁnitely is. Like so many longhaired breeds, this one too is the result of a genetic mutation of a shorthair—in this case, the Burmese.
I have been working on some variation of this post for a very, very long time. When I started it, it was a vehement anti-stats rant.
Year: 2009
I feel so out of touch with my TBA blogs since the new school year started (just the typical adjustment process); however, I am slowly finding a balance.
Metalhearts – Replicants Rampage (PC)
Then Again
I also plan on painting mine this pretty purple by Pure Ice (one of my cheaper brands) for Easter this weekend. Maybe my sister and I can get our Mom to go a little color crazy with her nails during our nail-painting party this weekend!
decided ... what the h*** ... and bought one.
Exam on Black Boy
2/3 yard lining fabric
They’re super cute though, after each class I’ve been inviting the students to talk to me outside of class by saying I’m pretty friendless and lonely in Korea. A few students are quite fluent and I got cornered after the last class and assaulted with questions and reassurances that I do have friends – the students. It was really adorable.
Dies: Tim Holtz Sizzlits Festive Greenery
Your employees will rise to your high standards if you give them a chance.
Question No. 1: Do you have a properly designed buy-sell agreement that can guarantee a market and fair price for every shareholder if there is a loss of a shareholder due to death, disability or retirement? If the answer is yes, then ask if a funding mechanism is currently in place.
Long post alert..
When dinner was ready, my grandmother took her cold plate of salads and sliced ham into the sun porch to eat by herself.
1. Preheat the oven to 180 degrees and grease/line two cake tins.
TECHNIQUES
Next was Gilly with a lovely card, just the splash of turquoise on the browns made this into a stunner! Go and see here - isn't it great? Another wry smile here - Gilly had to take her photo in the kitchen (the tiles were a perfect backdrop in fact!). It made me think that I bet we get up to all sorts of antics trying to find decent light for photographing cards at this time of year! Ooer, also, there was a teensy sneak peek of Gilly's wedding invitations on WOYWW - I'm watching for the full show of them and will link into the roll call once all is revealed :)
Back to flowers- I'm excited by this peony. When we moved here, there were pale pink peonies by the deck and I discovered a bunch more waaaaay back by the fence, overgrown by bushes and trees- too overgrown and shaded to bloom. I moved them two years ago and this is the first year they are going to bloom. These look to be hot pink- more photos to come when they open.
However, there was a brilliant moment when Bones had to force Cat to realise this may be one time when they don't win, and that she would have to let it go if they couldn't stop him. With Cat being such a fiercely strong woman, the idea of giving up, of allowing Kramer to kill innocent women every single year for all eternity, because they simply couldn't stop him, is just completely abhorrent to her. But it's a strong possibility. It was a great moment!
It is one more sunset to savor,
blind to a fault
Every movie has a message, whether it wants to have one or not. In Tim Burton’s ALICE IN WONDERLAND, the message is this: You have to do what’s expected of you before you can do what you want. As messages go, it’s not a bad one, especially in early 21st century America, where it seems everyone is expected to either go to college, join the military, or get a low-paying, hard-working job. Societies tend to work this way; the general populace wants to watch films about individualists but they don’t want them mucking up the agreed-upon system. The hope of Burton’s message is that you have to earn your own path – but it is a path that is attainable. Just do what others want until you have enough capital to tell them you’re flying away.
Researchers from the U.S. Geological Survey and the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration reported Thursday that sightings of the massive Asian tiger shrimp, which can eat their smaller cousins, were 10 times higher in 2011 than in 2010.
Bewitch Me, Please
That's because most people tend to forget what happened at the beginning of the sentence by the time they get to the end. You must make it easy for people.
8. Raghupati
There is an old saying that “Ten years in teaching is one year repeated ten times”. That is sad if true – given the procedural latitude we have in our classrooms. That latitude is an under-rated privilege of our profession that many other professions don’t share.
The taxi driver who drives me home is a relief. A rich, friendly voice with an impenetrably thick accent: he says he was from Uruguay. My ears struggle to get even the gist, but it doesn't worry him. I feel like Spanish visitor to the UK encountering a Highlander. Talking is an art form for some people, and he's certainly one; even his inevitable life story, and how 'la crisis' (2001) changed his life, sounds like a wonderful poetic saga, and has probably been retold and refined like a saga too. I can't make much more than the simplest observations, and find myself immediately understood as if I've been part of a dialogue all along. The will to communicate creates communication.
I played around with it for a bit, and it's really neat. It reminded me of when I taught myself HTML code back in junior high. I learned to do basic coding because I wanted to tweak the basic Geocities format, and then went from there. I never learned anything terribly advanced, mostly because my interest in techno-gadgets wanes pretty quickly, but with an online tutor such as Codecademy, I could be persuaded to expand my skill set.
*Please contact Wendy at shabbynest(at)yahoo(dot)com to inquire about rates for/to request a product review or giveaway.
The Secretary of the Treasury, Mr. John W. Snow, has a letter to the dissembling editor of The Old Grey Doxy. In his epistle, which appears here through Editor and Publisher Mr. Snow makes it plain that the administration’s efforts were anything but “half-hearted” as the paper – in its paper-thin and seditious defense – claimed:
Glam anthems and hardcore rants. The whir of techno and the crunch of britpop. Emo-boy crying and scary stalker screeds. The Cooper Temple Clause are a wily bunch, that's for sure.
There are times in my life…when I am sad…that I call to mind the faces of my little children, when I sang them this song…how it turned their sad little faces to happy little faces…and then…I don’t feel so bad!
Throw them on to the parchment lined baking sheet. Spread evenly- one layer single layer is best.
IBU: 126
Discovering the cancer in June 2011 I fought for what is mine and I can honestly say it never had a chance of taking my life.
The Operation Write Home (OWH)mid week thowdown COLOR CHALLENGE is being sponsored this week by Great Impressions. It is a color challenge using bright pink, turquoise, purple and orange...cheerful tropical colors! I used the cute little "potted kitty" and some bright Stampin Up papers. I think this kitty might just be in a bit of trouble after digging up these pretty little flowers, but how could you be mad at an innocent face like that?
Stay safe if there are storms where you are and sweet dreams.
I'm also a magic bean buyer, but that is a story for another day.
My topic? Fanfiction! So of course, I had to wear my favorite Team Peeta T-shirt.
There is a new interview with composer Zbigniew Preisner. He had worked with Kieslowski on several films, including the Three Colors trilogy. By the time they did Blue together the two men had a very familiar shorthand and knew what the wanted. Preisner recalls first working with Kieslowski and talks about his working methods.
Despite writing this piece on the 30th of April, I’ve been unable to do anything with it until today…. It’s fairly raw. Still I hope you enjoy it. Sometimes life simply “is”.
We have some small tables that are easy to set up and don't take up much space (always an issue for us). Cynthia has several of the battery lit candles that were added to tables for atmosphere. The food was Indian food from Trader Joe's that only required a couple of minutes in the microwave. Each dish was served individually,the name and history of the food was read, then tasted. Everyone actually tried each dish offered and found favorites they never imagined they would like.
“I recently asked all of you to submit your screencasts to me for review. The best of the best will be chosen to be featured here, in my various channels and outlets. This provides content of a different perspective for our community, and gives you new exposure for your work! Jack has submitted…”
I had suspected this might happen, but other than the fact that I couldn't do my cotton candy berm now, I really didn't mind. The purpose of this experiment was more about going through the process of creating the domes, rather than having some perfect finished product.
“Those squirmy shapes instead of real body shapes look gross to you”
I empty the full glass
Ontario Seniors’ Secretariat – Public Education and Awareness Unit
It is the apostle’s defense to show that he is, and why he is, God’s apostle. It starts with the truth of Jesus Christ. He is the Son of God. How did Paul know? He spoke with Him. Then it involves the failure of Israel spiritually. If it weren’t for that Paul would not have been chosen as the Apostle of the Gentiles.
1. He lived at home until he was 30
Changing all the words, like this is better for your health
"He saw that the man was down but continued to shoot him twice," the witness said.
9. Pip (Team Adam) – “Somewhere Only We Know” On paper this is a good song choice for Pip. The original has a sweet, lilting, emotional quality that makes me well up inside even though it’s supposedly whiny wuss rock. It’s both soft and urgent. Pip’s performance was neither. His stage presence was preening like a Glee-era high school show choir, which is not how he should have conveyed the vulnerability in the lyrics. Meanwhile his singing was ass from beginning to end. On the soft intro he went low on each of his phrases way too early, resulting in an off-key sound. He blew a lot of the big notes in the middle and end which just annihilated any speck of emotion that was standing after those stage moves. What a waste!
In my teardrop body you sleep, sucking your thumb —
It has recently come out that current New Orleans Saints defensive coordinator Gregg Williams has been incentivizing big hits, forced fumbles, interceptions and sacks with cash to his players. According to former Washington Redskins strong safety Matt Bowen in a Chicago Tribune column, this system was in place when he played in DC as well.
Not only do they offer freebies, but these shops would be falling behind their competitors if they didn’t offer a point card that could be redeemed for coupons, discounts, and even more freebies.
I got a call from the doctor (it was actually the doctor not the nurse or the MA, perhaps that should have been my first clue) that took out what we thought was a cyst from Payton's shoulder last week. He actually said, "Now don't freak out." People only say that when they know something is going to happen that you would most likely freak out about. It is sort a preparation like telling someone to duck just before you hit them with a 2X4.
Beyond adding a deep red color and therefore justifying the name Vampiro, beet juice just doesn't sound all that appealing. Still, it's preferable to making a drink with definitions 1 and 3.
of our life together, those early mornings
The songs in the medley include these forgotten gems: The Girl In The Gingham Gown, Ragtime In The Air, Dark Eyes Are Now A-Shinin' For You.
In the past 20 years, my meat-eating habits have peetered to less than 5-6 meals per month with meat. For both budget-saving and absent-minded laziness, I do not buy meat nor prepare meat often anymore. But by no means, do I practice meat abstinence diligently. I just have smaller portions of meat now.
After the study was done, the male doctor went back to his study typing up some numbers on his computer. The female doctor walked me to a separate room, and informed me of my perfect vision. I sensed a taste of disdain in her delivery. Then we went to the front desk, and I got my money. I am a picky writer, and I needed to test one more thing.
Americano
That Christmas thing will be upon us shortly. How come, when we were little Christmas never came around this quick? Does time travel faster the older you get?
This movie contains a mild swear word, (commentaries contain sexual swear words) and unpleasant scenes.
If you can bear to hear the truth you've spoken
18: 1:45-1:50
Flipboard
“PR’s (Pakatan) failure to set up a shadow Cabinet despite its increased presence in parliament is saddening and I urge PR leaders to fix this problem,” said IDEAS’ CEO, Wan Saiful Wan Jan, in a press statement.
No, we need to be honest in everything.Yes, it is a hard thing to be. It is a hard thing to do. Being honest can hurt. Remember, though, that with being honest, we can be kind. We can speak and act with love. That is one of the things that we are here to learn and to be. Watch what happens when we are honest. If you can see your whole life without feeling guilty about anything, then you are a truly honest person. Life improves, people trust us with all of their hearts, and we become strong.
I’ve always wanted to write a blog. I admired those who did, thinking “wow, those people have guts”. What I find difficult about having a blog is having to come out of your shell, expose your thoughts for anyone to see. Not the easiest thing to do. When writing publicly you need to weigh your every word, so that you don’t say too much or too little. I actually read an article on this the other day and it said blogging nowadays is some sort of art. I guess being an interesting person is as well.
My one worry about this show is how long it can last. Inevitably there can be no lasting relationship between father and son, for to end his autism is to ruin the premise and without making it a character drama it becomes boring and episodic. But even if it only lasts for a season or two, it will be well worth it.
In other news night-weaning is going great guns. I'm now not feeding BB until about 4am, and only getting up once or twice before then to rub her back to resettle. I understand that for some people this isn't a triumph, but for us it is.
We shall see what happens.
Across the city, life in 2010 became deadlier for blacks and safer for whites: the white homicide victims decreased 27 percent. The number of black people murdered rose 31 percent, to 357 from 272.
Now, I’m beginning to question whether every Bio that can be readily accessed on-line should be just as polished? And that got me to thinking about all the web sites I’ve posted to and the many versions of “About the Author” I have floating around out there. For a while, I was just posting to any place that would let me. My form of marketing…ha!
Seeing solutions: One student drew people working in stations with their backs to one another. She pictured a collaborative environment with work spaces facing one another and a group of sofas at the side where people could go to confer on their work. In her mind this would change how she and colleagues collaborate at work.
I first just drew a really simple tree trunk shape on the paper side of the fusible webbing. I used the pattern on my fabric as inspiration, don't get stressed about it, just a big simple shape is fine! Iron the webbing onto the brown fabric and cut the shape out on the drawn line.
You've boarded up every door
"To be successful at any change, you need to really want it. Unless you take the time to think about what it is that you really want you (rather than what you should do or should stop doing), you will invariably end up making resolutions that you are not fully committed to.
You always had ears for me.
In fact, both types of implants include the use of silicone shells or bags which contain a certain substance. That substance is either a mixture of saline and water (saline implants) or silicone gel (silicone manufacturers implants).
I will be giving away a gift certificate for $10.00 to Creative Kuts to one Lucky Winner.
If you too are a fan of Christmas lights, you may like to check out this blog, which details how one family spent $686 per hour - or $82,000 running Christmas lights (4 hours/night for 4 weeks).
Alright it’s time to tagged this 1.
Signing off,
Outstanding trait: Courage and doubt
02 - Ragtop Deluxe 03:19
Ultimate Whirligig: Dogwood Blossoms
good fortune: luck
On Monday, the Federation of Unions of SA urged the government to stop “cadre deployment” and to curb corruption in local, provincial, and national government.
My next big goal is to be like Temple Grandin someday and go around speaking and teaching like she does.
Thus end the Bhaktivedanta Purports to the Sixth Chapter of the Śrīmad-Bhagavad-gītā in the matter of Sāṅkhya-yoga Brahma-vidyā.
In the midst of it all, I'm still not sure if I will continue to vaccinate my children or not. I'm still battling with my own beliefs after this butt load of knowledge has smacked me in the face. I do know, that I feel guilty for not even taking a second look at what doctor's have injected into my son's body for the last 3 1/2 years and now my daughter, for the last 7 months. Luckily, my children are fine.
butterflies
Then I asked the cashier what was going on and she said "filming" with a huge smile.
Another service, Dropbox can also be used to share files and photos via links, but it is currently more clunky than Google+ for vendor communication as you have to share the files individually if the recipient is not also using Dropbox. Dropbox’s sharing feature also just doubles the rate that each subscriber that “shares” eats up their allocated space increasing the amount needed and therefore revenues of Dropbox. Box.net is similar to Dropbox.
…It’s your Mother. Is that how the expression goes?
I loved Totoro so much, that I believed in the Cat Bus! Haha!
This, in a nutshell, was the cause of the tumult. If those Jews failed to understand the change of dispensations, how much more for this Roman captain?
Q. What will I have to pay for?
The CS is Lavender Lace and the DP is from Basic Grey but I can't remember which pack I got it from (a sure sign you have TOO much paper!!!!) The flowers were made with my SU flower punches and the sentiment is also from an SU Mini Messages set. I have coloured it using chalks and Copics.
then above all the others, put on the shield of faith. Note: the shield of
Deirdra: Can you tell us a little about your book Lacey Blue and Friends?
Wei tossed back his brandy and poured another for himself not even bothering to offer to refill Watanabe’s glass. Like Watanabe, Wei knew a thing or two about his counterpart. He knew that Watanabe’s family had emigrated from Japan some time after the end of the war to end all wars.
Finally I also would love to share with you one of 2 of my projects featured in this month's Cardmaking & Papercraft magazine (issue 103)! This particular project is a 3-page spread called "10 ideas with Numbers" on pages 24-26. I used MFT Die-namics By The Letters, MFT By The Numbers Die-namics and Stamp set and Echo Park Victoria Gardens 12x12 Collection Kit - all available to buy (or order if it's out of stock!) from MMCS!!
. . .And you have tried to build a career on being a teen mom!
Scoutmob: A popular app that many hipsters and city-dwellers alike keep on their smart phones to get sweet deals on restaurants, clothing stores, coffeehouses, bars, and other urban things that hipsters would like. What is Scoutmob’s logo? It’s a little guy with a handlebar mustache. Not only that, but they have an app on the app that allows you to take a picture with various forms of mustaches super-imposed on your face. The writing on Scoutmob’s website is quirky as well. In their instructions on how to use the app, number six is “Click ‘I’M DONE!’ and commence to high-fiving.” Hipsters definitely identify with this flashy lingo.
To use it in the Android app, you need to enable the feature when you first launch it. It asks whether you want to enable Dropbox over your data plan and whether you want to upload existing photos and videos. When you hit “Upload,” the eligible photos and videos move to your Dropbox.
Paper-Die Cuts With A View
Anyone else currently writing vows? Anyone already done it? Send me tips and advice – I desperately need them!
let them dance.
Maud Haviernick, 29 - materials engineering
So who’s to blame for the acceptance of such untruth. Americans on a whole, or companies who create such garbage. You want to know the answer I would like to give to make you not hate me? It’s all the media’s fault. Phew. Okay. Now you want to know the real answer? It’s our fault. Yes, that means us. Myself included.
Writing not yet strong enough: if I look at a first page and find five cases of the dreaded double verbing (was running, were singing, am walking… try ran, sang, walk etc.), I’m guessing the rest of the manuscript is like that too. I’m not saying the occasional double verbing is the end of everything, but there’s a difference between a double verb every twenty pages and twenty on one page. Oh, and this includes you first person present tense writers. Double verbs are bad. Read Hunger Games and tell me how many double verbs she has…I think first person present was the biggest addition to my No category for double verbing alone (okay, I think you all get the picture, two verbs are much weaker than one, go forth and disseminate to all your friends). Weak writing was the number one trigger for making me pounce on the no.
And then when we got to my office, she asked: "Who is the Dalai Lama, anyway?" Whoops. Nice prep work, mom. Thanks to National Geographic Kids and a few other helpful websites, she had herself an expedited education in the hours before we set off for the big event.
My Dad has not got a clue about any of this and assumes I am his real son. Should I try to re-submit all the information I have given over the years or just sweep it under the carpet like I did when I found out my sister, Tracey Tontodonati, was only my half sister ?".
8 large eggs, beaten (I used the equivalent amount of egg beaters)
He used some of his money (and perhaps donations) to set up his Faith Foundation in America. Odd sort of thing for an ex-politician but - his choice, nothing to do with we Rigbys.
After that, there was...well, home time, more movies and computer games, and then a brief jaunt off to the neighborhood pool before dinner, which was thrown together hastily, as I had my eyes on the bigger prize - a HUGE vat of homemade salsa, from my garden tomato-and-jalapeno haul.
I am a parent that loves competition and all that a team can teach a child ... I want to win every time one of my kids take the field/court (I mean that is why they keep score), but if we lose then we lose ... We work harder for the next game and we congratulate the other team ...
She remembered her neighbor as an elegant women in a broad straw hat, dressed in white, with flowing blond hair and "a warm smile."
The skies have grown cold here at the castle and the sound of the last few jingle bells of the season are being carried away by the wailing wind. Or is that demonic chittering that we hear ringing in the frosty air? It could very well be, because we're discussing Jacques Tourneur's supernatural classic Night of the Demon (or Curse of the Demon for us Yankees) in this thrilling episode of Sinister Spotlight.
The fans prepared this event to say “It has been 100 days, on the 16th since 2PM’s leader Jaebum left. We think it is time that Jaebum comes back and although this is not a formal event it was done out of the free will from fans”.
The MAS-AirAsia deal had identified the core areas to achieve savings, synergies and increase revenue and given the huge volume expected from the three airlines in these areas, economies of scale can be achieved, thus reducing operational costs that will eventually benefit the customers or flyers.
Such sustained protests were last seen during the reformasi years in the 1990s with the arrest and jailing of the then Deputy Prime Minister Datuk Seri Anwar Ibrahim.
Sip, snack and shake it up with one of Boston’s newest favorite athletes in Towne Stove and Spirits’ luxurious Back Bay Room. Sports aficionados, philanthropists, socialites – and everyone in between – will be treated to complimentary wine and beer selections alongside hors d’oeuvres prepared by Culinary Director Lydia Shire. Stiemsma’s dedication to community causes is one that has graciously traveled with him from Wisconsin to Boston and Towne is proud to raise its glass to this unforgettable night-with-a-cause.
We had a separate contest for our friends who serve our community including fire departments, EMS and community service organizations. The winner in that category was the Hamden Firefighters Association with their “Nasty Bird.” They will receive a $100 prize.
I’m keeping the insulated super bag handy, since Thanksgiving is just around the corner and — who knows? — maybe I’ll want to prepare turkey and all the fixin’s at my desk if I have to work that day. I could even bring a few family members along, secured safely in the side pockets.
Cheers to you all, and have a safe and Happy Holiday.
Black Pudding turned to Chav Harry and his mates and then pointed to a spot further down the beach.
The Harvard Law professor argued she didn’t use her minority status to get her teaching jobs, and slammed her Republican rival U.S. Sen.Scott Brown for suggesting otherwise.
“We know we have to pick our battles and this was one we had already lost,” one source said.
Then Joshua spoke to the Lord in the day when the Lord delivered up the Amorites before the children of Israel, and he said in the sight of Israel:
BATTLESHIP – MAY 18
Anyhow, these little references and influences point to a slightly different picture of Lynch than the usual one, although these examples are all from post-BLUE VELVET movies — I don’t think the earlier Lynch films reference cinema nearly so much. I suspect his childhood and personal fantasies supplied all the initial impetus he needed, and then the longer he’s worked in film the more movie quotations have seeped into his work in an osmotic fashion. The point is not to denounce him as a thieving swine, but merely to point out the more complicated relationship his cinema has with other movies.
(Please, please, please, pass this on if you agree. If you don’t agree, just delete it.)
Plastered over the real rhythms of the universe
Level 6: Mastery: +58%, Weapon ATT: +6, Minimum Critical Damage: +3%.
Half of a fresh lime
The closure of Shamsi airbase does not debilitate overall drone operations, as it is based in Afghanistan. It’s likely that the supply routes will be restored. But the US should now increase focus on the Northern Distribution Network.
On average, a family spends close to 3,000 a year on eating out. Can you fathom THAT?
Laura and Scott breezed in for less than 48 hours the weekend of her Birthday in the midst of the Arapahoe project. We jam packed their hours with good food, drink, conversation, and of course hauling boxes out of Scott's car and back into Scott's car for their trip back to Spokane. Sometimes it seems as though we move STUFF from one location to another continuously. STUFF; the things that begin to weigh us down and take over our lives. There is a theme here, people.
Cake/Cupcake Flavor Carrot
I’ve also worked with a number of stylish men over the years in a variety of industry contexts. One older colleague who is certainly the best-dressed man over 60 that I know is always immaculate. I’ve told him that when I grow up I want to be like him! J All of these encounters, of course, influence one’s approach to and interest in style.
There were at least two other believers on board. They were Luke, the human penman of this book of Acts and Aristarchus. They too would be helping in the effort as indicated by the use of the word “we”. “We cast out with our own hands the tackling of the ship.
Some seventy years ago a scholar named Dorothy Sayers wrote a series of essays about the Church, in which she documented what was then the perception of faith from outsiders. Her words are as strikingly accurate today as they were in the 1940s. She wrote the following:
Thanks to all my wonderful friends and my family for the love they show me... Coach Alex is the bestest friend I ever had and I love her very much! And 911r you are absolutely AMAZING to me. And all of you have been good to me. Thanks.
If we want to understand Jesus we must learn his language. I am not saying we must learn Hebrew, Aramaic or Greek, though that is an excellent thing to do. Instead I am saying that we must know the titles, the concepts and expectations of the prophets who were before Jesus, because it is with these words that Jesus speaks and invites us to understand him.
1:28 p.m. — Boiled (and now cooling) 0.5 cups water to use to rehydrate yeast.
Sara started preschool this fall at the Busy Bee Preschool. She loves her teacher, Mrs. Nicole. She goes on Tuesdays and Thursdays from 9-11:30. It's perfect for us. She was a little nervous at first, but she is loving it. Here are a few pictures of her back to school:
Not only are you not allowed to laugh at politics, you guys. You're not even allowed to find any aspect of it charming. I'm done, I say! I throw my hands up in the air! Fine, assholes! You win!
light brown sugar: 2 1/4 cup
We AFFIRM the district court’s denial of Petitioner’s double jeopardy claim. As to Petitioner’s claim of ineffective assistance of counsel, we REVERSE and REMAND for further proceedings consistent with this opinion.
In lieu of a tent, which is just an absurd liability in a light-infantry tactical environment, and recognizing the drawbacks of the bivy sack as the sole shelter for extended stays in the outdoors, I still keep a "Ranger Hooch" system in my ruck. While the basic "Ranger Hooch" involves simply stringing up your poncho to provide a roof to keep precipitation off your head, I once had a squad leader who had developed the concept into a highly refined architectural marvel. His system, which I blatantly and unabashedly stole, allowed for the hooch to be pitched anywhere, under any conditions, and protect the individual from the vagaries of almost any imaginable ill weather conditions, from snow and rain, to high winds, and any combination of the above. The "Ranger Hooch" that SSG P used (I've always assumed he got the idea from somewhere else, rather than developing it, whole cloth, himself) I chose to modify, as I gained more experience. Mine includes a basic USGI rip-stop nylon poncho (I still use the old woodland BDU pattern type, because let's face it, ACU sucks for a camouflage pattern), with a loop of approximately eight inches of 550 cord tied to every eyelet around the perimeter, and a 12-inch loop tied off to the inside where the waist-band strings were originally. In addition, the hood is cinched as tightly closed as possible, tied off with 550 cord, and has a six foot long length of 550 cord extending from the noose. This allows for a great deal of tie-off real estate for constructing shelters in the field. I include 8-10 stainless steel tent pins (tent pegs are too space-consuming, as well as harder to drive into the ground in most terrain), 6-12 one-foot long bungee cords, and three sections of the old USGI shelter half poles, allowing me a great deal of flexibility in creating elevated corners and sides of the shelter. Combined with the Ranger Taco, or a sleeping bag with Gore-Tex bivy, this provides me a wide range of shelter options for "protection" from the elements when in a lay-up position or hide site.
Earlier this year 3 men were convicted of minor roles in the heist. One for driving the getaway car, another for trying to arrange a sale of artworks.
-”Yes relative 3 the prices are a little steep and yes I’m really sorry you’re missing Corrie”;
You never get to hear these stories you only ever get to hear mine...that's not really fair is it?
The United States Distance Learning Association is a non-profit organization formed in 1987 and is located in Boston, Massachusetts. USDLA promotes the development and application of distance learning for education and training and serves the needs of the distance learning community by providing advocacy, information, networking and opportunity. Distance education and training constituencies served include pre-k-12 education, higher and continuing education, home schooling as well as business, corporate, military, government, and telehealth markets. The USDLA trademarked logo is the recognized worldwide symbol of dedicated professionals committed to the distance learning industry.
After the messages, the monk started chanting again and they passed around little pots of incense. From the right side of the container, you take a pinch of incense between your fingers, raise it towards your forehead, and then lower it into the little raised bit on the left side of the pot. I believe you repeat this three times. Then you clasp your hands.
An’ hustlin’ drunken soldiers when they’re goin’ large a bit
Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi: They didn’t mean to do this, and in any case, they are not infallible. Mistakes can happen.
Growing up in a large family I never really expressed myself through what my 'space' looked like.
She comes first. Always has. Always will.
For a short period of time directly after the emancipation of the slaves, there was a period of Reconstruction. During this period, African-Americans were allowed to vote, help congressional office, started towns, schools, medical practices and began setting a foundation for greatness. While the accomplishments of this time period were quickly stunted by Jim Crow laws and institutional racism throughout the U.S., the spirit of achievement has never been completely diminished in Black people. Despite any attempts to the contrary, Black people have shaped America through constant innovation in science, art, cuisine, and undeniably through style. This website is a celebration of the innovative style of a people and all of the ways that it has evolved.
What Mom didn’t teach me was how to finish a project in a timely manner. She has very little interest in finishing one project before starting another. This has been very freeing to me. Perhaps a little too freeing. I have no idea how many started, but unfinished projects I even have.
Whataya Want From Me – Adam Lambert
Travel is fatal to prejudice, bigotry and narrow-mindedness.
She mumbled an apology and said something to the effect that she hadn't been talking about me, just grandparents in general. Although, a minute later, I think I heard her whisper to her friend, “Stay away from that grandma over there. She’s touchy about her age.”
Everybody cares and wears the sheeps' clothes
Doodle Bug - the fun of childhood! Bubblegum, cream soda, and hints of new born baby.
Lost became the raiment’s of my consciousness
Take your hands off me
WORMS!!!!
Let’s all breathe a sigh of relief as we pack away our Pesach kit and get back to “normal” cooking. But as one festival passes, another is always on the horizon. This time, we look ahead to one of the most fun holidays on our calendar – Yom Ha’atzmaut (Israeli Independence Day). In Israel, it’s the only official holiday on which no religious observance is required. This means carefree cooking, and no worries about getting it all done early and how each dish reheats. Cook it in the morning, cook it in the evening, cook it at supper time!
A 1.5GHz dual-core processor along with 1 GB of RAM powers this bulky package along. This is more than enough to tackle browsing, streaming and viewing HD content. The best deal of it all is the 3,300mAh battery. The Motorola RAZR MAXX is running Android 2.3.6 Gingerbread, but signs are showing that Android 4.0 ICS is closing in!
Chelsea must enter this fixture as favourites, following a good run of form which has seen them reach the Champions League final, and demolish QPR 6-1 at the weekend. A return to form for striker Fernando Torres in the last two games has ignited belief that the striker could finally be coming good at the right time for the blues.
Whilst a merry track about a failed suicide might have been a huge novelty hit, the public seemed to give it a rather cold reception in the USA and it appears not to have charted nationally. MGM then chanced their arm with a UK release - where the track was known as "Theodore", presumably to prevent confusion amongst British people about what the "Astor" actually was - but it was equally unsuccessful on these shores. The band seemingly sank into obscurity thereafter, but in recent weeks I have managed to find a full page Cashbox advert for the record being sold on ebay, which at least gives us an idea of what they looked like. I also wonder if the grave and dramatic tone the copywriter came up with really gave everyone an accurate idea of the flavour of the record. Tsk. Record companies, eh?
If you dropped in at the Turbine Hall at Tate Modern recently, you might have seen Tacita Dean's work, Film, which was the twelfth in the Unilever series. I was lucky enough to be asked by my cinematographer friend Sam Garwood to a private view for the film industry: the sponsors were companies like Kodak (sharp intake of breath), the BSC, and Arri. I assumed it would be the kind of event that I once described to my offspring as "just a stand-up and shout": long on polite shop-talk and short on cake and bouncy castles. The only difference from the book-industry equivalent would be the gender balance and the fact that I wouldn't know anyone. And, it being February in the dear old/new Turbine Hall, it would be cold: even the invitations had suggested that guests might like to Wrap Up Warm.
All four starters looked good. I watched James McDonald warm up in the bullpen and he was all over the place. When he started so shaky in the first and second it looked like it was going to be a long game. But as he sometimes does, he figured it out and shut the door on the Braves from that point on.
And speaking of Dean Wareham, ACC had a dream last nite that Dean was standing in a park phoning in his vocals for Slide and asked ACC to do the back-ups. So we both stood there in a lush and green park, recording our vocals into the phone. Oh hells yes. No Dubonnet on ice but it was still, u know, paradise.
Over the years, we have met so many people, and most have kindly let us into a little of their lives. This is a privilege that we never abuse. Running a smallish guest house rather than a large hotel means that we have the opportunity to become personally acquainted with our guests – they are not simple numbers to us. As a result, we have met some really wonderful people; and when they make return visits, they are greeted with the anticipation and enthusiasm one reserves for friends.
What’s this? An accident on the M1? Closing a huge chunk of our route to Dom’s? Nooooo, this can’t be happening…
I imagine it will be wonderful, beautiful, and the most fun we've had in a long, long time.
Papers - K and Co
The pieces on this disc have a 30-year span between them; from the Unpublished Quartet of 1935 to the Third Quartet of 1965. Those numbered 1 and 2 date from 1939 and 1954 respectively. Although this music is not easily accessible, repeated listening will reveal an artist that is deeply sensitive not only to the seismic changes of his time, but also to those minute events that affect everyday life.
I was very satisfied with the pictures. No,...I was ecstatic with the pictures I had and couldn't wait to share them with the BloggerHood. I remained there for a few minutes scrolling through the pictures.
I plan for a simpler, less stressful Christmas season and, every year, by Christmas Eve I'm exhausted! After our delicious and very-time-consuming-to-make traditional Swedish meal to honor my husband¹s relatives (think: Vikings), it's time to head to church. I'm embarrassed to admit it, but the last few Christmas Eve's, I have sent my husband and kids head off without me. The pull to spend an hour of quiet in the house feels as strong as a magnet.
Trying to forget about my week's stress, today I took P to The Red House, the former home of William Morris and a wonder to behold. I told P I wanted decor inspiration for the new flat, but he was none too pleased when he realised that would mean floral wallpaper and patterned ceilings! Here's a few of the photos I managed to sneak while the staff weren't looking...
Beach pics & posts to follow, but in the meantime, would you all be so kind to click here and vote for us again this year? We’ve been nominated in the Circle of Moms Top 25 Moms of Multiples blogs for 2012! I appreciate your vote, and you can click once a day through May 23rd! THANKS A TON!
Monkeyphonic Alpahabets. Don't get me started on this one! This started life trying to be a funk/rock song because I was heavily influenced at the time by Little Barrie who are heavy rockin' but oh so funky with it, but nobody wanted to touch it. So I re wrote it as a jazzy vibe, all nice and mellow. Again, nobody would play it. I was really getting frustrated by this time because I knew that I had something good going down but I wasn't sure how to breath life into it. I stuck with it and one day, quite out of the blue, I was noodling away on the tune that we always warmed up to, which was a bastardisation of an old David Crosby vibe that he had nicked off Neil Young, and bugger me if the lyrics didn't fit it exactly! The chorus just wanted a new set of chords and it was job done. Everybody liked it. We then recorded it with a ten minute version with about 100 guitars all over it! The idea was to use a fade out technique but we later decided against this. Nobody fancied editing it either, so I spent a four hour session one evening with Ian at Airplay just trimming, trimming, trimming until we had got it down to what I regarded as an acceptable 7.30 secs bang on and most of the mess cleaned up. It still required a considerable amount of work after that to tidy up and make good, but the end result is a song that the majority of people say is their favorite Magic Ship song, including a lot of chicks. Yeah baby! If I had a penny for everybody who has said that they have no idea what it is about then I'd be quite rich by now. All I'll say is that after sending some lyrics to a mate of mine, very early on in my first flush of writing songs, he said that I was full of Transatlanticisms and general nonsense verbosity by using words such as 'baby' and so forth. Serves me right for asking for an opinion! So I set about writing a song about such verbosity and nonsense. I was reminded by a particular episode of South Park where Cartman is given a Monkey Phonics play set to help him improve his literacy and I kind of connected with the idea of using the Monkey Phonics concept to express my feeling at being regarded as nothing much more than a verbose lyricist. And this was feed back from a bloke that writes songs about homosexual prostitutes! However, it's not just about verbosity. That was just my songwriters gimmick. The song eventually became all about...
Let's look at Pier 1. That store just kills me. First of all, we do not have the same selection as the U.S. stores, and secondly, I would never shop at the one in Canada because of the prices.
“Can he?” Jessica asked, interested in spite of herself.
Dish: Slow Cooker Glazed Pork Loin
On his last evening, R and I climb to the top of the hill behind our house. From here, we can see for miles in every direction, across seas and forests and mountains. But what we have come for is the light show in the West.
My body went numb and cold when you tasted my lips,
She sat us down and started her talk. She began by telling us she'd heard about Lucien from other teachers before he was assigned to her class. She'd heard he had a hard time sitting still, that he was loud, that he played too rough, that he delighted in breaking the rules. She'd heard all these things and more before he even stepped into her classroom.
I’m not totally sure how to put this into words. So, I’m glad I kept it together enough to take pictures for you all! If anyone ever gets the chance to come to Germany at the end of September I HIGHLY reccomend that you stop and check out Oktoberfest. I also reccomend that you wear steel gloves. My hand is so sore from where the handle of the glass rested. Also, you should watch the movie Beerfest 8 times in a row and drink every time they do. It’s a GREAT drinking game and good practice for what is unveiled at this Oktoberfest!
I am sad.
Last night, at a literary fundraiser that featured author Alexander Macleod speaking with other CanLit authors, the Atlantic Book Awards Society announced the shortlists of nominated titles for its nine different book prizes.
Okay, I realize no one new to this blog would get it without reading some backstory here (re: archives). All I can say is I can't guarantee it is funny enough to read my archives, and if you do you may disagree about the funny factor of sickness, but if you do (disagree) the yoke is on you. :^)
I've read a huge number of 2000AD stories, but their high quality makes me think it's unfair speak of only one. But since I have to choose, I think: Cry of the Werewolf, Robo-Hunter, Future Shocks and others. Too many of the latter to pick out just one!
(Things you might not know about her)
Have you started to show yet: Absolutely!
“Are you nervous?” Kim asked while filming me.
To avoid misunderstandings: I'm NOT pleading for educational pampering. To the contrary!
Reasons why I love this song:
Based on settled case law, the General Court held that appeals against decisions, which were confirmatory of an earlier decision, which were not challenged in due time (as was the case here in relation to OHIM's Second Board of Appeal's decision in relation to the first trade mark application), must be declared inadmissible. The OHIM Board of Appeal's (confirmatory) decision accordingly became final, with regard to both the operative part of the decision and the grounds on which it was made, and could no longer be challenged before the Court. Such a challenge would only be permissible if there were new factors, as compared with the first decision, which would necessitate a re-examination of Paroc's situation. Paroc had provided no further information in this regard that could have undermined the confirmatory decision.
- My wife says: Nothing, she was watching my big fat gypsy wedding in the other room
Experiment with your vinaigrette ingredients. If too tangy, you can add a pinch of sweet. Start with a little less tang and add more. Remember, it should have a little zip before you toss it with your veggie/salad. Try the recipe once with lemon juice and the next time with your favorite white vinegar.
Karolyn came over and asked us if we were eating, and indeed we were. We started off with an order of calamari for all of us, and it came out piping hot, straight from the fryer a few minutes later. This were fried nicely to a golden brown, and you could tell the oil they were fried in as fresh and clean. No dirty, burnt crumbs, and just fresh flavor. This hit the spot, and was the perfect starter.
I know that these bank closings make me feel better about keeping my money in a bank and that reviewing them makes me feel as though we have turned the corner, and I know you feel the same way. Don’t let the fact that the FDIC is underfunded for what’s been happening bother your silly little head. Barack can always print more money just like he’s been doing right along. So what if it isn’t worth the paper it’s printed on? And don’t let the fact that printing money devalues the dollar regularly scare you either–and for goodness sakes, don’t be fretting over that little ole Standard and Poor’s downgrade! I mean who cares if the dollar will eventually be worthless, right? Then we can go on that “world currency” George Soros is drooling over. Then the USA can just be one of the guys with all the other third world shithole countries while unseen manipulators continue to spread our wealth around to other places as well as into their own pockets. I love when they do that, don’t you? Especially with countries that haven’t got a pot to piss in and hate our guts at the same time. Why, if we are good, we might even get a couple of goats too!
I made this Toblerone Cheesecake for my son’s 16th birthday and naturally it didn’t last long. I used Malteasers to decorate and I had heaps of fun getting the swirl effect.
I knew almost nothing about Narciso Ibáñez Serrador's 1976 movie ¿Quién puede matar a un niño? except that it was a horror movie, and I figured a horror movie with a title like that ought to at least be interesting. And it is that.
FIRST IS FUN.
But the closer we come to a mountain the smaller it seems to appear, until even a small hill can completly obstruct its view. So it often is with big events or unpleasant circumstances in the future. They may be frightening or seem impossibly large, but when the time actually comes they don’t seem half as big or as difficult as we’d expected.
When thrown into a different culture as a foreign exchange student, you’re quickly immersed in their day-to-day social norms. During my junior year of high school, I decided to go on a 10-day trip to Spain with my classmates. After 5 days of exploring different cities together, we then split up. Each of us were taken to a different town and stayed with different families for the remainder of the trip. As I roamed the streets on my first day in Malpica de Tajo (a small town outside of Toledo) with my “Spain sister,” Nuria, I began to get into their culture. With so much to observe and feeling slightly overwhelmed, I think I kissed more cheeks that day than spoke any actual Spanish. It was some time on day three that speaking the language and kissing both cheeks before giving anyone my name felt natural.
Alex and his droogie friends in A Clockwork Orange spend their slack time in the Korova milk bar drinking Moloko, or "milk-plus" --the "plus" being any one of a selection of near-futuristic designer drugs. Moloko may not contain actual alcohol, but the added vellocet, synthemesc or drencrom make Alex feel "knifey." Anything that leads to stomping hobos, putting the smackdown to random academics and leaving a newsstand covered in blood is apt to be pretty strong (and a long way from making risque jokes at the office party).
It would be a disservice to not mention Richard Jenkins and Bradley Whitford, playing techies Sitterson and Hadley, who open the film in a way that may be jarring. You may not know what’s happening at first but you will love being confused as Jenkins and Whitford produce the perfect blend of humor and malice, giving you a reflection of our own society. Also, fans of Whedon and Goddard will be happy to see Amy Acker (“Angel” and “Dollhouse”) on screen, playing Jenkins’ and Whitford’s more serious counterpart.
I know that I have been selfish in thinking that I so-wish-to-God that she could have been with me through the birth of my two children, as well as the Postpartum anxiety that followed...and almost put me in a mental hospital, and a grave. But I never really thought about what she went through.
But here’s an example of a house that still won’t sell, despite being very close to its 2001 price, when it sold at full price for $3.6million. Today it’s at $3.7 million. Other than reader Stanwich, who loves the road, Cat Rock is often a difficult sell, particularly in a weak market. My guess, and it’s just a guess, is that, if these owners have to sell in the near future, they’re going to have to take a loss.
Or listened to the rain
it's a cushioned board where I can sit my laptop and to the right there's a chalkboard (finally jumped on that bandwagon!) where I can jot down quick notes or I can use the space to put my notebook for my detailed notes. Here's how I did it, but first the supplies:
She is going to see Dr. Ginny tomorrow for her 6 month check up so I'll post about those stats and add her 6 month pictures then.
Do we sound Southern, or what?
For today's Playing in Paradise challenge, Laurel asked us to create a paper craft based on this inspiration picture. I was challenged tonight in creating this one but I think it is because I am tired and my mojo has left the building!
Favorite number: 09.07.05.
Came to the conclusion that it must be gravity. One person goes, and everyone else gets sucked along (but I'm open to your thoughts).
Every day, I’m told that most of Whitehall has greeted the ToryDems with a level of relief similar to that of being liberated from the Nazis. Almost all the senior Sir Humphreys are both delighted to see the back of Labour’s interfering and unelected consultancy army; and the middle-of-the-road requirements of making a Coalition work are right up their street: no need for tough decisions and hard work, don’t you know.
Let the page dry and then record your thoughts. I use Prismacolor Markers in my nature journal (I wrote a review of these markers HERE). I made sure to use one of the color blocks for the month and year. You could even sketch something in one of the blocks if you want to since this is your nature journal. I love to do make some doodle-style frames for my color blocks with swirls, dots, and dashes. Be creative and have some fun!
There won’t be any question of the kind of car you owned but if you used it to help others who were elsewise bound to home.
268 ***5. “An Introduction to ‘Ancient’ African Thought.” The Great Ideas Today, vol. 1995, pp. 146-77 (Encyclopedia Brittanica, 1995). (Source: Item D-IV/17/1994, below. Incorporated in Item B-12, above, pp. 31-65 (2002).)
A man that certainly doesn't need an introduction; Dali was as famed for his eccentric pencil-tash as he was for his incredible surrealist masterpieces. A self made 'celebrity' in his own right, Dali along with Warhol paved a new way for artists during the mid-century. His works have been recreated, criticised and praodied to no end, his most famous work The Persistence of Memory has even been parodied on The Simpsons.. Now you may be thinking, with such a wealth of information readily available of Dali, what could I possibly tell or show you all that you haven't seen on him already, well firstly, I feel I owe it to him as his work has in effect changed and shaped my life. At the tender age of 11, I had already begun delving into fellow surrealist/symbolist Gustav Klimt's work, stealing any of my sister's books I could I became increasingly fascinated with this alternate universe that was depicted within these paintings, with no knowledge of meaning to them, it was the sheer spontaneity of them which drew me in. One day I stumbled across a book entitled 'Dali' with the most magnificent cover; a terracotta landscape with azure blue sky, huge defined beige clouds lined the sky, then out of nowhere these out-of-scale butterflies the size of the cliff came flying off the page- I was trapped. I couldn't help but read on, as I turned page by page, I was astonished, the photos resembled photographs and at a time before computers I was gobsmacked at the accuracy of the works. One picture in particular which stood out to me and to this day is one of my favourite pieces by Dali is Giraffe (Pictured below).
"Hi, Gene! How are you? You having a nice day? Before you ask, my day could be a lot better."
On current evidence as gathered from TV, I would unhesitatingly call them the worst behaved team in the tournament.
The commission, he said, appealed to the Legislature, which refused to support the governor and the crisis faded.
CREAM PUFFS
"Go get the door blondage."
Highlight along the brow bone. Doing it this way will make your features stand out naturally and beautifully.
This Hello baby season 5 has already come to an end now. Last week was the last episode of this season. I was cry so badly when I watched their farewell part. It was so sad and touching.
I like a reposado tequila for margaritas.
Overall, the arguments seem to marginally favour rewriting, but I don't know whether I have time, and I'm deeply reluctant to take down a book already published. All thoughts on the issue very much welcomed!
We love to be sure of things. Be tend to believe that uncertainty is a bad thing. We don’t like not knowing. There always has to be a goal. “The nature of spiritual life is that we are certain in our uncertainty, consequently we do not make our nests anywhere.” Then, Chamber says, “Certainty is the mark of the common-sense life; gracious uncertainty is the mark of the spiritual life.” It’s kind of a paradox. (I may not be using that word properly.) If we are certain of God, we are going to be uncertain of our ways and our lives. We don’t know what this day will bring. “This is generally said with a sigh of sadness; it should be rather an expression of breathless expectation.” As I read these lines, I’m thinking of how our day has begun today. Talk about uncertainty!! We live in that! We don’t know what our next step will be, but we are certain of God! “Immediately we abandon to God, and do the duty that lies nearest, He packs our life with surprises all the time.” Creeds are dangerous. I don’t discount them. In fact, they can be very valuable. However, the danger is in believing our beliefs about God, rather than believing God. Jesus did not tell us to believe certain facts about him. He told us to believe in him. When we leave it all to him, it is “gloriously uncertain” how he will work things out, but it is most certain that he will.
Gospel Canticles of Lauds and Vespers in the 8 Tones
My initial thought was 'I'm blessed that they are all asleep' - but reflecting on my day I started to feel a little guilty about that initial, glib first thought...
Arcadius was challenged at the final hurdle by Divine Fortune and amateur rider Darren Nagle. Those two dueled down the homestretch with Arcadius getting home one length in front of Divine Fortune. Nationbuilder and Danielle Hodsdon were 12 3/4 lengths back in third.
Welcome to the Carnival of Homechooling! Won’t you come on in, get a cup of coffee and make yourself comfortable? We have quite a few great entry’s this week so lets jump right in!
whao I rarely get excited when I see a new lookbook (maybe it's cause I'm always so busy or maybe I'm just a big a-hole) but when I saw this on BecauseImAddicted I had an instant urge to repost this GOOD ASS styling....
And we mother them again.
I was always a wee bit aware of 2000AD, I think. I remember seeing it in the corner shop when I was picking up my very first Marvel reprints at the age of four. It was very obviously for older boys and scared me a bit. Then there were 2000AD annuals in the school library that were officially only for Year 5 kids, but my teacher could see that I was bursting with curiosity and made an exception for me.
the whisper they will be all right
It 'has also been found useful in conditions such as fever, malaria, dysentery and other ailments.
supremacy.
It was great to meet you Dawn and I just loved it how everyone screamed when they saw you in the Expo Hall. You really are a famous blogger!
You know how it is with an April day
We have to adapt our economic development according to the water resources that we have, not vice versa. The impact on our water needs to be integrated from the very beginning into every economic development plan.
The next time you finish your shift at work, don’t go home to count your dollars, go meet up with your friends and sing along to your favorite song together as loud as you can. Fist-punching the air is optional.
It was wrong to pander to the spectacular, the deliberate assault on the fairly transparent idea that you and I should live on this fucked up planet until we leave it as something better than the victims of an advertising campaign for the mad, the bad and the completely insane. Which, it seems to me, is what an aweful lot of us basic humans do.
To serve sprinkle bacon on top of rice cakes along with more parsley and peas if you like.
A few miles away, Pappy, Manny, Pitcher and the rest of the swamp dwellers were scrambling. The camp was alive with activity. Camouflage nets were pulled from boats. Gear was packed and stowed. Weapons and ammunition were distributed. Packs were slung onto backs.
In one respect, things were a bit more relaxed. Paul was no longer bound. Of course that would be true for he was Roman and it was illegal to bind a Roman citizen without a fair trial or condemned. This also shows that Lysius had gained a certain respect for his prisoner.
*ensure staff are led and supported by board members, senior
7, Take the french toast out of the fridge and preheat your oven to 160o/c. Replace the clingfilm with foil and bake for 30mins covered. Then remove the foil and bake for a further 10 minutes until golden brown and piping hot through.
The star value of Bale and Cruise were used in selling both Asian-centric films. Asians have not seen a sustainable viable all-round star since the days of Sessue Hayakawa and James Shigeta. Jackie Chan is one example of what could have been. He’s been acting since the 1970s as a stuntman in Bruce Lee films before attempting to strike out on his own in the U.S. market achieving limited success including a notable role in the Cannonball Run films. Like Lee, he took his talents to Hong Kong where he achieved his biggest success. U.S. audiences started taking notice of him again after his 1997 action film, Rumble in the Bronx enjoyed international crossover success.
And I shouldn’t have to explain how that’s nonsense.
Minnie was overheard: “I can’t hold on much longer. I am losing my grip. Oh God. Hold on Wolf. You are going down.”
I am the lord of the dance, said he
Mentally feeble.
So, seeing how awesome you all are at giving sparkle-gift-inducing-recommendations-of-pure-win, I am now coming to you with a plea for help for myself.
The tag backgrounds were done with the wrinkle free distress technique then stamped with the flowers and I used the same DIs to just lightly paint them in which has given them more form. In-between I cut tags using baking parchment and used a flourish stamp with Stazon and a small one with Flitter glue and gilding flakes.
Also, Friday Pick will be delayed and I will post it by Saturday.
I went back to Twitter to crack the clue. The next trending topic was “RIPPaulMcCartney”. Poor Paul.
Fast forward about 5 years, and not only is the bare patch completely covered with ivy, but the wall was obliterated, the emerald arborvitae was sporting an ivy skirt, and the concrete block of the house foundation was growing green. I knew at that moment that I had to keep a better eye on that ivy. I also understood the term “invasive” when referring to certain overbearing plants. In fact, I’ve since read that you really should avoid planting this ivy because it is so hard to contain.
And being tired! How the fuck am I meant to have a life when I’m checking my phone every 5 damn minutes wondering if it’s an acceptable time to go to bed yet while I’m laying on the couch in a half comatose state struggling to keep myself awake and utter more than a grunt. Tell meeeeee! And don’t tell me I just need to rest. Fucking bullshit.
Me: Are you kidding me?
No doubt following Rebecca Black’s cue, thousands of girls with rich fathers have probably made music videos, hoping that one of theirs will go viral and they will become successful. If Rebecca Black taught us anything, it’s that you don’t need talent, you don’t need to hone your craft, and you don’t need to actually work hard. As long as you have money, you can skip all of those minor details.
One observer is quoted as saying that the "easiest way for the police to reduce the crime rate is simply to do nothing but record only those crimes where a case number is absolutely mandatory".
The one performance that I was really surprised by was how good Ray Allen was here as Jesus (yes, that really is his name). Whenever people see that a first-time actor is given his chance for a lead role, they usually shriek and see horror happen right before their eyes but somehow Allen makes me think otherwise about that idea. Allen was a great pick because he shows a character that is obviously very angsty, very confused, and very angry at everyone around him and Allen shows that perfectly on-and-off the court. Even his scenes with Washington feel real and it’s a real wonder as to why Allen didn’t get more acting roles or even go for other ones during his off-season. At least he has a championship under his thumb now but whats better: Oscar or NBA Championship? Hmmmmmm, I think I would go with the first.
(optional red pepper flakes if not serving to kids, we put ours on top after just for the adults)
Row 5- (1sc in 3sc, 2sc in next) (30)
Every corner we turn will lead us, every corner we turn will lead us down the labyrinths, and every desire that we earn will guide us alive, living, loving & searching.
they're somewhere over there
Their home page looks like this…
Right now I am going through one of the more difficult periods of my recent life. Family and personal issues only marginally within my control have finally reached a breaking point and the fallout from that has been exhausting, demanding, and draining. The effort required of me to confront these events and their causes has taken from me the time I might normally be spending losing myself in my hobbies, including WoW, however, the constant that remains is the people the game has brought into my life. Those folks have been here for me in the past few weeks, buoying my spirit and renewing my faith in ways I have desperately needed, even if only through a few sympathetic words or a silly kitten picture on Facebook. Life sometimes takes us through dark places, and often the light we rediscover while there is cradled in the hands of other people. One of my favorite quotes is from the book Contact, by Carl Sagan, and it sums up what I feel rather well:
Suspended in her soup, the words didn’t catch. But she knew the voice, disguised as waves, and the voice was God’s.
1 cup shrimps
11/18 Eugene, OR Wow Hall
unjustly imprisoned in the United States since 1998 sent messages of
If you finish another assignment early, you can then go back and fix any problems with your other assignments.
Timothy G. Byrne, 36, Manhattan, N.Y.
I love the different picnic set-ups in each picture. A-line dresses are featured liberally in this photoshoot and offer a comfortable way to enjoy picnics in comfort.
Somehow, some way, some where...I’ll see you at the rock show!
I thoroughly enjoyed the sparkling wit in the dialogue - Walker has always been clever with her word choice and sharp puns, and it made for some thoroughly entertaining exchanges.
As I approached the back pond, there was still now waterfowl or wading birds there, but there were flocks of different species of songbirds feeding in the grass around the pond, more than I can remember having seen there before. There were robins, starlings, grackles, several species of sparrows, several species of finches, and cardinals , just to name a few, all in the grass or brush around the edge of the pond. I also spotted a flicker and began shooting, even though I doubted that what I was getting would be worth posting, and they weren’t, but another flicker landed in a bush closer to e and I was able to get a few good shots of it.
Nothing shall hinder the accomplishment of the determinate counsel and foreknowledge of God; for “whom He did foreknow, He also did predestinate;” and “whom He did predestinate, them He also called; and whom He called, them He also justified; and whom He justified, them He also glorified.” It is all done in God’s account, and nothing in earth or hell can undo it.
We called into the museum, which held the history of Hereford from prehistoric days. On the main wall up the stairs, was an amazing mosaic floor from the Roman town of Magnis (Kenchester). Sorry again no photographs allowed.
~ Size 3-6 months , 6 Month and a few 3 months clothes
I got this pair from Charlotte Russe.
According to a recent report by the Congressional Budget Office, rising income inequality is a long-term trend that began in the late 1970s and strengthened during the last two decades. The report confirms the protesters’ belief that the rising gap between the income of the top 1 percent and the income of everyone else is a major factor behind escalating inequality.
2) Make sure that you have two weeks of dry goods laid in supply. ALDI’s is great for this if you are poor like me, Costco and Sam’s club for the rest of you lucky bums with jobs. This will buy you time to think and wait out the initial shock wave of panic in the streets.
We didn’t play with Smokey but we would have loved to. Of course, it would have helped if I could remember one of his songs. For no reason, my mind went blank. Luckily I still knew how to play golf.
winter solitude
Move: 150 feet/turn
Again a great Leftist hope and aspiration.
Kuya Omme – My gratitude for all the support given, esp. the technical ones.
I work in the am...
Who is Judas Iscariot, we know very little about him even his last name Iscariot doesn't provide any clues. All we know for sure was that he was one of Jesus' 12 disciples and he was an Apocalypse Jew who believed the world as he knew it would end shortly. Ehrman surmises that the disciples expected to be in charge after the apocalypse with Jesus as their leader.
¼ teaspoon ginger
Friend: Lucky you...
According to the first police reports, the bodies of Huge and Luna were found in this municipality along with other two bodies that so far have not been identified.
Its a funny thing when I run with Super, as I seem to have rage in the early stages of a race, then get really happy (mile 21, anyone?), and she is the opposite. It works for us pretty well!
Product of U. S. Trunk Co."
'Cause there's no one like you in the universe
8. Ladle soup into bowls and top with parmesan cheese if desired.
The next day we make the three-hour drive southeast of Pretoria, to the Hill of Majuba, where on February 27, 1881, the Boer won a decisive battle against the British who, after gold was discovered, had tried to annex the Boer Republic of Transvaal. A week later, the British negotiated peace.
A debut novel that will leave you breathless. From Amazon UK
56 Milner Road
I saw many interesting comments and thoughts on this website i would love to make some comments on. Firstly, just like most members of the Nigerian youth community, my greatest desire is to see a change in Nigeria. It would be crucial to state from the start that i believe very strongly that the problems faced by Nigeria, have nothing to do with the wicked and corrupt government in Nigeria or the Nigerians that sit around always wishing something happens, but have their totality and roots founded upon the activities in the spiritual realm. Although those factors influence what’s happening, i believe we need to get to the root of the problem. Nigeria is not different from other countries in the world also facing various problems so there’s nothing surprising to me about Her present predicaments. The basis of my belief is from scripture that clearly says that we wrestle not against flesh and blood but principalities and powers, and rulers of the darkness OF THIS WORLD.
"You look a little tense, Bev." I say to her, "Anything wrong?"
I am the diamond glints on snow.
I'm learning to cook in thirty minute grooves
Well, that’s a lot to take in, but here’s a handy list of the episodes that we all agree are great:
all you can do five years later is look back and say...i should have done things differently......
"Our narrator is not a person. It is a building; the South Tower of the World Trade Center, whose height and thousand of windows provide the first truly-panoramic view of 9/11.
Ubsy, who is genetically an African American man, says the more he learned about Palin, the more he liked her.
Cover fabric with another thin layer of Mod Podge. Lift plate up from paper and place on the bottom of a pot or something elevated for the plate to dry completely. Drying could take up to 30 minutes depending on the thickness of the Mod Podge.
I'm really disappointed... this woman was soooo nice and seemed very competent the first time I talked to her. She asked so many questions I really thought she would offer the best attention to detail and I wouldn't have to worry about so much wedding stuff. And she had the best price for waitstaff that I could find!
~ I picked up the kids from school the other day and they had decided with some of their friends that they are going to ride their bikes to school from now on. If you know where we live and where their school is, you're already laughing. If not, let me just tell you - it is over six miles from our house and takes fifteen minutes to reach by car. Can you imagine a 6 year old and 9 year old on bikes hiking it across town crossing major highways and the busiest intersection on the tollway at 6 a.m? I tried talking some sense into them, but nothing would do. So, I drove the route with them and showed them that more than 3 miles of it contain no sidewalks. "NOT AN ISSUE, MOM! We can ride our bikes in the grass!" (By grass, they mean pastures.) I asked them about cold weather and rainy weather. They informed me they like it. So, once football season is over, we're running a little experiment with them. We're loading them up on their bikes and then following them in the van to see how far they make it. I'm placing bets on the two mile marker. ;)
I’m already putting into place within the Library a means for individuals to submit articles for consideration by simply tagging them with a specific keyword. Once that keyword is in the post’s tags, the system will automatically grab the post and get it ready for a peer review process. What that entails and what interface will be necessary I am still working on. Which brings me to:
Books about:
So we pray
Time to stop for today – getting too long. Finish tomorrow.
And the black cross of the holy house,
I now have around 25 copies of the book! All of them are second hand. Some have notes in the margins and underlined passages from lucky students who had this marvelous book on their curriculum and others have love notes on the first page to their original owners.
Of the strings
The solution was right there in our discarded wood pile.
“sunlight is said to be the best of disinfectants”
I have so much admiration and respect for Dr Ameisen. Yesterday’s experience on Twitter was just a glimpse into the criticism and dismissal that he must face all the time.
Negatives: Blind loyalty can lead a person to back someone even when they don't agree with them. When truth is on the line, this can damage a person's credibility. Loyals can take the idea so far that their loyalty overrides their ability to think for themselves. They take on the ideals and beliefs of the person they support, and lose their sense of self.
Hope you're all enjoying the glorious weather we're having, at the moment, it certainly feels like spring is well and truly here and at Fashionable Stamping Challenges we're looking for your fabulous Spring creations. The Stampettes have designed some Spring Show Stoppers for your inspiration so please do head over to FSC to have a look. Our lovely sponsor Marina will be offering the winning entry a prize from Cottages Crafts.
Anyway, I finally tracked the mini-series down this weekend and jumped straight into the story of the destruction of the Twelve Colonies Of Kobol by the Cylons and the emergence of the Galactica as the last, best hope for humanity. ( Or is that a different show? ) I've got hooked all over again and am working my way through Season One - it's frakkin' awesome!
Folks, this means JAIL TIME. Several years of it. We're hoping for about five.
The right whales that Knowlton has seen this spring in Cape Cod Bay show signs of malnourishment.
CISPA’s authorization for information sharing extends far beyond Web companies and social networks. It would also apply to Internet service providers, including ones that already have an intimate relationship with Washington officialdom. Large companies including AT&T and Verizon handed billions of customer records to the NSA; only Qwest refused to participate. Verizon turned over customer data to the FBI without court orders. An AT&T whistleblower accused the company of illegally opening its network to the NSA, a practice that the U.S. Congress retroactively made legal in 2008.
To not sit back and whither and die.
*The character Cassandra is not why the story is called “Cassandra”. The reason why the story and the character are both called Cassandra is the same reason, though.
